Stray Book of Lucifer

Lucifer


Now there were soldiers of cities and people in government jobs who were foolish as evil children, for when some attacked their own people they spoke as if justice towards them was not as an individual but as if there was a civil war. Now the citizen is king and they are the primary thing that is owner of a nation and a citizen, that criminals are not citizens in their crimes and those who have been targeted by crime the criminals for such would be joining hands with wickedness and it is a cognitive impairment, an abomination and a warped person who says the criminal is the citizen in their crime, for those who say so partner with their wickedness. Now the soldiers of cities, Adonijeh, is having less morality and integrity than the people that though they are equal, Solomon is king, or the people. Now David is the only thing a higher king than Solomon. Now government employees are only citizens and it is a common thing and the head of the Adonijeh that speaks otherwise is below the devil who is his lord, for he speaks rebellion against God, against Solomon, treachery, and civil war, for he is sick and he speaks lies that are not, for government employees are not the government but receive only payment from the government, that they are servants in what they perform and Adonijeh promotes rebellion against his brother that he is against David and Solomon in this thing, for David and Solomon are always together. Now Adonijeh is like a Hebrew Jew among Zion Jews, and a bastard of Zion is not so, for he is your bastard. Now do not put away or reject anything that is required for your people, for when the winds come the wall must be there and I, too, have cursed some of my own walls, and I am a bastard. Now where you find Solomon soldiers of cities, are not the people blessed by it? Now Adonijeh has his own cult and religion that is rebellion against God, and it is an offence to the people because of its wickedness and injustice, for it is a cult that narcissistic and praises Adonijeh and says he is righteous regardless of what he does, for he is defiant towards God and offensive to the people, for when he promotes himself as king it is an offence to justice and truth, even offensive to the angel that the angel favours Solomon and David. Now this cult is called Territar and so the religion of it that evolves is called the same, and it is a religion of narcissism and self-righteousness and insolence against God, for the Lord defies the unjust claiming to be righteous. Now the speaking of it is insolent, for it is unjust and many perversity are found in it for they eat swine much and fill themselves with it, for sin is good to them, and wickedness is acceptable. Now they do not eat swine as the Christians eat it where they keep such acceptable, for to these it is acceptable and they are people not for insolence. Now have not many Christians become bitter and like bitter stones for a person receives nothing from stones, often, and some are not the Christian stones, but are sickly stones, not meant to be stones, for they have no interest in accomplishing, no interest in giving, no interest in partnering and they have become bitter, but with others it is not so who are Christians, now this bitterness is a sickly type of stubbornness for it is not as Christian stones but as sickly stones that are having no zeal and there are indeed Hebrew Jews who are like-wise that they are as if sickly stones that have no zeal, no interest in accomplishing for God or the things of God happening. Now those who are zealous to be shepherded by God, these are those who are believers.

Now those people, not angels, are they not having their type, and you speak to soldiers about combat but they are made of what you speak of. Now what is the domain of angels, and what the primary estate of them? But it is not the concern of people. 

I call them kerit who do not perceive their hatred towards another but it is revealed to them and others later after their hateful actions have occurred. Now these do not feel their own hate or sense it, and they even marry those they hate and have no love for them, and with women, no love or respect, for the person they marry is an object to them and in their selfishness they regard them not and they do not love them but their soul hates them. Now this person is a cheap slut by a woman’s standard, and a prostitute in truth, and yet the slave is better than them who curses and reviles.

A man who steals from another or commits a cowardly act believing it is for them in war is an insane man who is as a dangerous animal to others and he is without comprehension of basic things for he cannot even insult himself in his wicked doings because of his great simplicity and wickedness, that he is a coward, wicked, simple, unjust and exalts himself as if a poor man who praises himself wickedly, that he is desperate, wicked, and yet not wronged, for a person of worth he must be to have been wronged, for he is wronged by his own imagination only and he is full of iniquity, an insane animal that knows no truth or reality, for drunk he is on inquiry and ignorance of truth, for he has committed much wickedness prior, and who says it is poverty that does it? But is he not also a Harrod? But it is not poverty or mistreatment, but he is a man more than men and it is his mistreatment of others. Now his pride brings him to more wickedness and he will not indulge rebuke, for he is a man-child and much a man, a hunter who spills too much blood, and eater of meat without any other food and a drinker of blood, the blood of deer, that are nasty. Now he lacks understanding and his gentle brothers who have wisdom and honour and all types of nobility and compassion, these are not his brothers but are a different people than him. Now I looked and repented of my being against the dark shade and yet I did not repent because I knew the abuse for them if they remained with the fair shade and the vexation and trouble for the fair shade if they should remain in the same places, for the dark shade is independent and on their own and so it must be for both to avoid abuse for the dark shade will not likely ever prosper the same, to the fullness, if they remain with the fair shade, and so I hardened myself like a field surgeon, to be cruel, to push away compassion from me that the people, some, might despise my words and yet live and prosper. For the scalpel I held and I knew that compassion would cause more suffering and death even and more poverty and I said, I would rather wise men thank me after I am gone that my reputation be good in Mala even if I tarnish it on Earth. Now a compassionate surgeon is a monster and perverse and I have said, I must indeed be a dragon in this thing that I not be cursed as a wicked and perverse fool because of compassion and there are those who see and know whose worth in such a rebuke would be of the Lord. Now angel, do your task, as a zealous, mighty man does in battle for wisdom and truth commands and the Lord is God and He is truly more loving than you. So I instructed myself and hardened my hand to the task. Now I call him who is the father of equality and mercy, who struggles for control, the father of mercy, perversity, and disrespect for his compassion is the perverse smothering of the dark shade, for he is a mother-king, mothering soldiers that they might be handed to the enemy to be beaten up and lessened in ability, but he who respected God was competent and he made order, seperate the people out of respect of them, with consideration, and he did not speak perverse compassion to men, but removed his hand and spoke what was required. Now let your voice no longer be heard, father of compassion without competence, for you are able to understand and I will respect the Lord and the people by segregation, putting away perverse compassion out of compassion. Let go and aid in re-location, for they have said, we have accomplished much, and yet they grind forward only imperceptible amounts and then go back, for their struggle is fruitless much among the other people and they must have their own place if they are to fulfill their society. Now let them treat their own like children when it is good, and I go out to kill the bird that is wounded, that will not survive, and a young one cries and I will no doubt be accused by many, but I accuse the man who should know better, who allowed for the bird to suffer so long, that he should have done what I did if any should be accused. Now was this man also as blind as the others, that I Shepard? But I cannot Shepard and offer wisdom and I cannot be a Shepard to any people, but I Shepard a little without intending in places because of giving wisdom. Now the dark shade is better now than Edom and yet they wish to rebuild it? But the Christ and the Bible is better than Edom and with which groups Edom was found is unknown by me. But a perverse and sick garden is Edom but the Christ offers all that is edible. Now I would be wicked here if I said I Shepard the dark shade, for I do not and my path goes elsewhere, and yet will I not say, for my integrity, what is in the word? But I cannot Shepard and who knows if it will ever come that I truly do, but I know that though goats are wise yet they are not the shepards of the sheep in the church that they have been found in this place and thus opposed good people when they came because they had taken a wrong place for them even though they are wise. Now are you not forgiving the goats where it is only Christian to forgive them, for goats have done many good things, and diligently also, and who is to say you would not have greater rebukes for errors you have made? But let the Lord judge and every person knowing what is right according to what is. For I am not the Lord, and yet great wrong against me can give the number upon the hand and fire-head for a wicked would attempt to separate angel from God, and they tried such with the Christ to separate son from father and God is not a fool and He is not unjust, but He is perfect. Now if gods rise up, slaves, yet they get a bruise on their head and iniquity, and the field is for them and there are those who are slaves of slaves that they are too far beneath you to be your slaves. Now those under the Earth are slaves and prostitutes of the enemy, being the devil’s, and such prostitutes hate the Lord’s children, all of them, and they fight in the Great War between hell and the Lord’s kingdoms. Now there are devils below Earth and many types of soldiers and there are some who have received the number on their head and hand because they would do iniquity to innocence, and yet such does not bring the number in all cases. Now it is known by those who are enlightened that there is a just recompense, revenge, for every wrong, and those in darkness are not considering and some not wanting to know.

Now if a person is married to a child of angels they must mantain that of people, now if one who performs on land is married to a Sufi they are mantaining what they have, whether both or one thing. Now this is the integrity required when different types are wed, and a child of angels, if she is a woman, will be known by her surpassing women in integrity whether she was butterfly or moth. Now she is given more beauty and yet it remains by greater integrity and this a child of angels more beautiful and set apart from other children of angels, that they are a different type than them, and there is more beauty, and the true Japanese woman is comparable to her. Now who can be her mentor? But she is mortal and of angels. Now innocence she must have and more than Daniel, for she is a butterfly and yet wrong will destroy her. Now the person who does iniquity against innocence, yet do they not tempt God and place their feet over the pit? But who says, there is no God in their heart, for if it is in their heart have they not already been greatly punished? But there has been folly when the angel approached men and women, for there was awkwardness and offence, for he could not send an acceptable representative, that there was conflict, and accountable is this whole world for kings not given palaces and priests not being regarded as priests and accountable is this world for all the disorder, soldiers not following, business people not giving and gaining great profit, for they are rewarded by becoming rich when it is in righteousness and investing in good and even investing in the Lord’s work and condemned by their shut hand and their decaying to poverty for they have been wanted to become more rich and yet it is not of stones that are rich, for what can come from a stone? Will it yield crops? But each is having their place and their role and so consider righteousness and the fear of God and not wicked rebukes when they come.

Now the soldiers of cities were an inferior people, morally, and their morality was low and they did not understand, and when they would not do their job they all had to be replaced because they arrested the righteous but would not do anything concerning the wicked. So they rebelled and we’re traitors guilty of treason, for the country would be destroyed and it was not openly told to the people. Now perverse fools built up fantasies against the people and yet the people were morally superior to them and vigilantes had become idle and the people did not need them or the soldiers of the cities and I said in my heart, let them die if they support the soldiers of cities.

Now Incel was not a terrorist gang for there was no selfless cause for the people. But it was only ass-hole baby foolishness that did not make sense like the senseless impulses of a Baby not yet one years old. There was nothing to respect or acknowledge and it was utterly selfish and without reason for they strove to be men, not able to be men.

There is an anti-abilism spirit and abilism is not ableism for it is understood by itself to represent ability and be with morality and worth according to truth, being a thing of God and wisdom. Now the anti-abilism spirit that is wicked is for attacking great worth and value. Now do not strive to be great, but lower yourself to be humble and the Lord is able to give to you, that humility is not self-efacement with lies but it is truly humility for the person who is humble is humble in spirit. Now love, too, is not proud. Now the anti-abilism spirit is from the devil, a spirit given to his children for it says, injustice is right and justice is wicked and it makes much opposite for they have the devil as their lord and his morality is that injustice is right. Now these servants of the devil are slaves of slaves and the person of the kingdom God to them if they do the work of a demon towards them. Now then they are stolen from the devil.

A slave, a brutish big or small who had no senses of perversity or other things, not perceiving or sensing was told that some things were wrong by religion and having no sense of these things overcompensated by violence and evil against people not even with these wrong things described for he was striving to have the senses he lacked. Now religion, it is not for those slaves beneath the Earth, being that these slaves are from all shades and they have their own ways and their own paradigms of thought and they bring forth things from the catagory of slaves that things of slaves should not be brought forth by people for a person cannot bring forth things of slaves, unless they are learning them, for these things cannot come from them, for it is called learning a bad habit and can be undone, and with people it is unseemly and unnatural and the heart perceives it is not from them but that they have learned it, being deceived. Now why will you receive the punishment of this? But do not be deceived if any councils you to foolishness, for the Lord is just and you are called to have integrity.

Some things when there is evil: if there is escalation because of rebuke there was already great rage that was the motive for the actions that the smaller actions were restrained greatly that there is greater rage because of rebuke for they were restraining themselves greatly. Now how will you speak peace to one who has this rage? But words of peace will further enrage them and they go to a tipping point when the rage cannot go away anymore and they are no longer in control for they cannot help remaining enraged. Now no words will change it and no violence will cease it for you cannot deflate it by any cruel or good word for the rage hears nothing and it loses self-respect and dignity that the enraged sense nothing anymore and cannot insult themselves with their lack of dignity in anything. Now it is like an animal that is very sick that goes mauling for it is not a single incident of passion, else it would only be an angry person with wrath. Now it is a sickness, a blinding decease, and it must be stopped physically. Now a human woman does not take joy in wickedness done to a man as if revenge, but being wicked, and yet daughters who are slaves are finding cause to rejoice without knowledge of truth and they rejoice foolishly as if in cosmic war and yet the one wronged with wickedness did them no harm. Now they are slave women, these daughters and gatherings of enemy prostitutes and they have even called a human woman stupid, and she has greater wisdom, being precious, and they have proclaimed themselves Jews, these slaves, some have, and claimed the human women are stupid, and these slaves are not Jews. Now Jews are called even to be holy, and the ways of Jeroboam are a brutish paradigm and yet David is defending the holy places. Now if wickedness is occurring to a human then a human daughter does not seek a false reason to rejoice, and she is beautiful, more than a flower, beyond priceless, a jewal and all that is lovely. Now wickedness occurring to a human is no business of slaves and prostitutes that they might rejoice, but they have their labour and they are not even human, but the ears of human daughter, let her be deaf to all false religions and brutish ways and the man, let him seek truth and not be foolish. Now there are Salem Jews or Zion Jews that are not Hebrew Jews, for they are Zion’s Jews, and these are not as slaves and neither are the Hebrew Jews who are not slaves among them. Now the anti-physicist or anti-logic or anti-truth is speaking fantasy about what is not possible for people, for there are words and actions that must be insincere and deliberate for there are limits to what is possible for a person and there is what cannot be with one thing that it cannot be found with another thing for not all can be blended. Now grievances of people are misunderstood by slaves and they adopt the grievances and misunderstand them that they are then wrong, and the grievances of people are found wrong and greatly out of proportion and slaves can be dangerous. Now these things are not for slaves, but they are for people. Now what things are for the wife are not for the prostitute and what is respect and good to a woman is great disrespect to the man, that you not question, like an animal people, civilized things of wisdom, for it is beneath Egypt, and it is a low disgust for any advanced people, for you have fire, houses, clothing, and you have wisdom before you. Now women have sought wisdom prior to the man, or is it not usually so? Now what is the business of the wife is not the business of the enemy prostitute. But there are those from the human catagory, the mountain catagory, the angel catagory, and all are human catagory and yet the angels are not human catagory, for they are not part of your people, but they are from Heaven with a purpose. Now the rocks from mountain category maintain the integrity of soil and with the stubborn rocks the soil turns to mud and there is no field. Now Sodom is after mud and comes from mud. Now those who rebel against themselves and then rebel against themselves outwardly are sicophants and if they are then like dreaming or drunk, for day dreamers are holy, when they are awake then these are also those who corrupt the flesh. Now those who corrupt the flesh with their mouths are speaking chaos and wickedness and all manner of blasphemy, and yet how can books do it, of any kind? Now a woman receiving no attention, afraid of romance, became a prostitution of the enemy and she was as one who is a virgin, and in her great wrath for being ignored, she went too far and sought to desecrate as much as she could, and she was a sicophant, and there have been many as her, ignored women. Now was not her hatred for all women so that in her hatred for women she attacked their men. But it was so. Now there are many sicophants and many doing different things and they are for desecrating what is sacred, destroying beauty, mutilating, and it is blasphemy to do combat to true love, even so that it may get the number of the beast, for there is a limit to what is a person and their wickedness that hell is before them beyond the realm of wickedness for people. Now I found nihilism in the world, indicative of ignorant societies, and there is a just recompense for everything. I also found puritanicalism and all puritanicalism is compatible with humans that you not be amazed by its wickedness when you do not understand it, for there is a balance to it and the circumcicions, and the circumcicion required by Babylon is to be a unich for the devil is hating all things from God. Now the devil is a high priest of the house of purity in Babylon and the house believes in Unichs, in celibates, all, and yet a willing celibate, a woman or man, these are holy statues among the people. Now this Tamar was that she wanted for her brother to do a very rare thing and yet this is not the case with others for she was desolate because he cast her out, very unwilling to leave and escape him, and Absolom did not understand it, for he killed her true love and husband. Now be a holy people then and you will not forsake the holy times of David and Solomon, or so I have believed, but to do spiritual things ignorantly is witchcraft, for to do wickedness in spiritual things, doing them wrong, it is chaos and rebellion and the ignorance is with the devil. Now some were traitors against the people, against Solomon and even David, and they were given nothing and they lacked understanding but had intelligence, being a thing that is beneficial, only they were void of understanding and they rebelled against God and man and all the truth of the Earth, for to face their being deceived was too great after so much work and time, for they had not known they were working to be servants, or that there were things far greater than them in every way, that they were as small children. Now the knife is for the hand of the Muslim or an angel and leaders who blaspheme, yet what is the way for the angel must be kept to and the man is with the citizens for the leader becomes servant to the people that the knife is not for the man if a leader blasphemes him. Now fools, adult children, weeping ones over easy things for adults to understand, and many other foolish things were in society and it was not Solomon and nor was it David. Now if any is then betraying Solomon, the people, to favour servants, then there are knives with Solomon’s people and Adonijeh, David, not the angel, or any aid or support is required for him, and nothing can defeat him, for if he broke all ties, even killing the vigilantes if they supported Adonijeh, yet he would be the most powerful in a Cold War. Now there were base people in their wickedness rebelling, pretending it was possible for any person to have a problem with others being greater than them, but it is not a possible problem that any is being impious to what is greater and these too were being impious by then feigning surprise to discover the greatness of another, for they were base, wicked, meant for the street, much with the spirit of the devil, Beelzebub, for the angel has spoken several times to Beelzebub through men possessed by him and he is wise, wicked, with the light of the lake of fire that burns as bright as white light. Now he teaches his servants wisdom in being impious, in ways of wickedness that you do not be surprised at their great wisdom, for in true wisdom they are fools and having little understanding. Now hate drives on a mouth and yet humanity restrains it in things that you know the devil is not much restrained when he is worse than servants who are bitter. Now men, show yourselves men in matters of morality for life and death is in the world and yet adult children are blasphemers and these are not children of angels or associated with angels, but they are mockers, and their spirits are perverse.


Some things when there is evil: if there is escalation because of rebuke there was already great rage that was the motive for the actions that the smaller actions were restrained greatly that there is greater rage because of rebuke for they were restraining themselves greatly. Now how will you speak peace to one who has this rage? But words of peace will further enrage them and they go to a tipping point when the rage cannot go away anymore and they are no longer in control for they cannot help remaining enraged. Now no words will change it and no violence will cease it for you cannot deflate it by any cruel or good word for the rage hears nothing and it loses self-respect and dignity that the enraged sense nothing anymore and cannot insult themselves with their lack of dignity in anything. Now it is like an animal that is very sick that goes mauling for it is not a single incident of passion, else it would only be an angry person with wrath. Now it is a sickness, a blinding decease, and it must be stopped physically. Now a human woman does not take joy in wickedness done to a man as if revenge, but being wicked, and yet daughters who are slaves are finding cause to rejoice without knowledge of truth and they rejoice foolishly as if in cosmic war and yet the one wronged with wickedness did them no harm. Now they are slave women, these daughters and gatherings of enemy prostitutes and they have even called a human woman stupid, and she has greater wisdom, being precious, and they have proclaimed themselves Jews, these slaves, some have, and claimed the human women are stupid, and these slaves are not Jews. Now Jews are called even to be holy, and the ways of Jeroboam are a brutish paradigm and yet David is defending the holy places. Now if wickedness is occurring to a human then a human daughter does not seek a false reason to rejoice, and she is beautiful, more than a flower, beyond priceless, a jewal and all that is lovely. Now wickedness occurring to a human is no business of slaves and prostitutes that they might rejoice, but they have their labour and they are not even human, but the ears of human daughter, let her be deaf to all false religions and brutish ways and the man, let him seek truth and not be foolish. Now there are Salem Jews or Zion Jews that are not Hebrew Jews, for they are Zion’s Jews, and these are not as slaves and neither are the Hebrew Jews who are not slaves among them. Now the anti-physicist or anti-logic or anti-truth is speaking fantasy about what is not possible for people, for there are words and actions that must be insincere and deliberate for there are limits to what is possible for a person and there is what cannot be with one thing that it cannot be found with another thing for not all can be blended. Now grievances of people are misunderstood by slaves and they adopt the grievances and misunderstand them that they are then wrong, and the grievances of people are found wrong and greatly out of proportion and slaves can be dangerous. Now these things are not for slaves, but they are for people. Now what things are for the wife are not for the prostitute and what is respect and good to a woman is great disrespect to the man, that you not question, like an animal people, civilized things of wisdom, for it is beneath Egypt, and it is a low disgust for any advanced people, for you have fire, houses, clothing, and you have wisdom before you. Now women have sought wisdom prior to the man, or is it not usually so? Now what is the business of the wife is not the business of the enemy prostitute. But there are those from the human catagory, the mountain catagory, the angel catagory, and all are human catagory and yet the angels are not human catagory, for they are not part of your people, but they are from Heaven with a purpose. Now the rocks from mountain category maintain the integrity of soil and with the stubborn rocks the soil turns to mud and there is no field. Now Sodom is after mud and comes from mud. Now those who rebel against themselves and then rebel against themselves outwardly are sicophants and if they are then like dreaming or drunk, for day dreamers are holy, when they are awake then these are also those who corrupt the flesh. Now those who corrupt the flesh with their mouths are speaking chaos and wickedness and all manner of blasphemy, and yet how can books do it, of any kind? Now a woman receiving no attention, afraid of romance, became a prostitution of the enemy and she was as one who is a virgin, and in her great wrath for being ignored, she went too far and sought to desecrate as much as she could, and she was a sicophant, and there have been many as her, ignored women. Now was not her hatred for all women so that in her hatred for women she attacked their men. But it was so. Now there are many sicophants and many doing different things and they are for desecrating what is sacred, destroying beauty, mutilating, and it is blasphemy to do combat to true love, even so that it may get the number of the beast, for there is a limit to what is a person and their wickedness that hell is before them beyond the realm of wickedness for people. Now I found nihilism in the world, indicative of ignorant societies, and there is a just recompense for everything. I also found puritanicalism and all puritanicalism is compatible with humans that you not be amazed by its wickedness when you do not understand it, for there is a balance to it and the circumcicions, and the circumcicion required by Babylon is to be a unich for the devil is hating all things from God. Now the devil is a high priest of the house of purity in Babylon and the house believes in Unichs, in celibates, all, and yet a willing celibate, a woman or man, these are holy statues among the people. Now this Tamar was that she wanted for her brother to do a very rare thing and yet this is not the case with others for she was desolate because he cast her out, very unwilling to leave and escape him, and Absolom did not understand it, for he killed her true love and husband. Now be a holy people then and you will not forsake the holy times of David and Solomon, or so I have believed, but to do spiritual things ignorantly is witchcraft, for to do wickedness in spiritual things, doing them wrong, it is chaos and rebellion and the ignorance is with the devil. Now some were traitors against the people, against Solomon and even David, and they were given nothing and they lacked understanding but had intelligence, being a thing that is beneficial, only they were void of understanding and they rebelled against God and man and all the truth of the Earth, for to face their being deceived was too great after so much work and time, for they had not known they were working to be servants, or that there were things far greater than them in every way, that they were as small children. Now the knife is for the hand of the Muslim or an angel and leaders who blaspheme, yet what is the way for the angel must be kept to and the man is with the citizens for the leader becomes servant to the people that the knife is not for the man if a leader blasphemes him. Now fools, adult children, weeping ones over easy things for adults to understand, and many other foolish things were in society and it was not Solomon and nor was it David. Now if any is then betraying Solomon, the people, to favour servants, then there are knives with Solomon’s people and Adonijeh, David, not the angel, or any aid or support is required for him, and nothing can defeat him, for if he broke all ties, even killing the vigilantes if they supported Adonijeh, yet he would be the most powerful in a Cold War. Now there were base people in their wickedness rebelling, pretending it was possible for any person to have a problem with others being greater than them, but it is not a possible problem that any is being impious to what is greater and these too were being impious by then feigning surprise to discover the greatness of another, for they were base, wicked, meant for the street, much with the spirit of the devil, Beelzebub, for the angel has spoken several times to Beelzebub through men possessed by him and he is wise, wicked, with the light of the lake of fire that burns as bright as white light. Now he teaches his servants wisdom in being impious, in ways of wickedness that you do not be surprised at their great wisdom, for in true wisdom they are fools and having little understanding. Now hate drives on a mouth and yet humanity restrains it in things that you know the devil is not much restrained when he is worse than servants who are bitter. Now men, show yourselves men in matters of morality for life and death is in the world and yet adult children are blasphemers and these are not children of angels or associated with angels, but they are mockers, and their spirits are

Now for those who perceive that ass-hole baby is profane, let it be profane for them, that they know what is clean, for the Christians, the priest-hood, does not use profane speech, and yet the term is the only term that conveys the right understanding, that profane speech is sometimes the only thing that conveys the right understanding, and so it is clean for me, for where profane speech is the only accurate thing for the understanding, then it is clean for me, and yet for those for whom it is not clean, I give the word abban and it means the same. Now I write in defence of the people much, and this is part of what I am for. Now the physicians who are not evil, I will not touch them, and I did not believe there was really a problem with them, that I have only offered a small rebuke for the people. For I said, let them be, and ignore any small problems they have, for they are in another place and the people in another place. 

Some things when there is evil: if there is escalation because of rebuke there was already great rage that was the motive for the actions that the smaller actions were restrained greatly that there is greater rage because of rebuke for they were restraining themselves greatly. Now how will you speak peace to one who has this rage? But words of peace will further enrage them and they go to a tipping point when the rage cannot go away anymore and they are no longer in control for they cannot help remaining enraged. Now no words will change it and no violence will cease it for you cannot deflate it by any cruel or good word for the rage hears nothing and it loses self-respect and dignity that the enraged sense nothing anymore and cannot insult themselves with their lack of dignity in anything. Now it is like an animal that is very sick that goes mauling for it is not a single incident of passion, else it would only be an angry person with wrath. Now it is a sickness, a blinding decease, and it must be stopped physically. Now a human woman does not take joy in wickedness done to a man as if revenge, but being wicked, and yet daughters who are slaves are finding cause to rejoice without knowledge of truth and they rejoice foolishly as if in cosmic war and yet the one wronged with wickedness did them no harm. Now they are slave women, these daughters and gatherings of enemy prostitutes and they have even called a human woman stupid, and she has greater wisdom, being precious, and they have proclaimed themselves Jews, these slaves, some have, and claimed the human women are stupid, and these slaves are not Jews. Now Jews are called even to be holy, and the ways of Jeroboam are a brutish paradigm and yet David is defending the holy places. Now if wickedness is occurring to a human then a human daughter does not seek a false reason to rejoice, and she is beautiful, more than a flower, beyond priceless, a jewal and all that is lovely. Now wickedness occurring to a human is no business of slaves and prostitutes that they might rejoice, but they have their labour and they are not even human, but the ears of human daughter, let her be deaf to all false religions and brutish ways and the man, let him seek truth and not be foolish. Now there are Salem Jews or Zion Jews that are not Hebrew Jews, for they are Zion’s Jews, and these are not as slaves and neither are the Hebrew Jews who are not slaves among them. Now the anti-physicist or anti-logic or anti-truth is speaking fantasy about what is not possible for people, for there are words and actions that must be insincere and deliberate for there are limits to what is possible for a person and there is what cannot be with one thing that it cannot be found with another thing for not all can be blended. Now grievances of people are misunderstood by slaves and they adopt the grievances and misunderstand them that they are then wrong, and the grievances of people are found wrong and greatly out of proportion and slaves can be dangerous. Now these things are not for slaves, but they are for people. Now what things are for the wife are not for the prostitute and what is respect and good to a woman is great disrespect to the man, that you not question, like an animal people, civilized things of wisdom, for it is beneath Egypt, and it is a low disgust for any advanced people, for you have fire, houses, clothing, and you have wisdom before you. Now women have sought wisdom prior to the man, or is it not usually so? Now what is the business of the wife is not the business of the enemy prostitute. But there are those from the human catagory, the mountain catagory, the angel catagory, and all are human catagory and yet the angels are not human catagory, for they are not part of your people, but they are from Heaven with a purpose. Now the rocks from mountain category maintain the integrity of soil and with the stubborn rocks the soil turns to mud and there is no field. Now Sodom is after mud and comes from mud. Now those who rebel against themselves and then rebel against themselves outwardly are sicophants and if they are then like dreaming or drunk, for day dreamers are holy, when they are awake then these are also those who corrupt the flesh. Now those who corrupt the flesh with their mouths are speaking chaos and wickedness and all manner of blasphemy, and yet how can books do it, of any kind? Now a woman receiving no attention, afraid of romance, became a prostitution of the enemy and she was as one who is a virgin, and in her great wrath for being ignored, she went too far and sought to desecrate as much as she could, and she was a sicophant, and there have been many as her, ignored women. Now was not her hatred for all women so that in her hatred for women she attacked their men. But it was so. Now there are many sicophants and many doing different things and they are for desecrating what is sacred, destroying beauty, mutilating, and it is blasphemy to do combat to true love, even so that it may get the number of the beast, for there is a limit to what is a person and their wickedness that hell is before them beyond the realm of wickedness for people. Now I found nihilism in the world, indicative of ignorant societies, and there is a just recompense for everything. I also found puritanicalism and all puritanicalism is compatible with humans that you not be amazed by its wickedness when you do not understand it, for there is a balance to it and the circumcicions, and the circumcicion required by Babylon is to be a unich for the devil is hating all things from God. Now the devil is a high priest of the house of purity in Babylon and the house believes in Unichs, in celibates, all, and yet a willing celibate, a woman or man, these are holy statues among the people. Now this Tamar was that she wanted for her brother to do a very rare thing and yet this is not the case with others for she was desolate because he cast her out, very unwilling to leave and escape him, and Absolom did not understand it, for he killed her true love and husband. Now be a holy people then and you will not forsake the holy times of David and Solomon, or so I have believed, but to do spiritual things ignorantly is witchcraft, for to do wickedness in spiritual things, doing them wrong, it is chaos and rebellion and the ignorance is with the devil. Now some were traitors against the people, against Solomon and even David, and they were given nothing and they lacked understanding but had intelligence, being a thing that is beneficial, only they were void of understanding and they rebelled against God and man and all the truth of the Earth, for to face their being deceived was too great after so much work and time, for they had not known they were working to be servants, or that there were things far greater than them in every way, that they were as small children. Now the knife is for the hand of the Muslim or an angel and leaders who blaspheme, yet what is the way for the angel must be kept to and the man is with the citizens for the leader becomes servant to the people that the knife is not for the man if a leader blasphemes him. Now fools, adult children, weeping ones over easy things for adults to understand, and many other foolish things were in society and it was not Solomon and nor was it David. Now if any is then betraying Solomon, the people, to favour servants, then there are knives with Solomon’s people and Adonijeh, David, not the angel, or any aid or support is required for him, and nothing can defeat him, for if he broke all ties, even killing the vigilantes if they supported Adonijeh, yet he would be the most powerful in a Cold War. Now there were base people in their wickedness rebelling, pretending it was possible for any person to have a problem with others being greater than them, but it is not a possible problem that any is being impious to what is greater and these too were being impious by then feigning surprise to discover the greatness of another, for they were base, wicked, meant for the street, much with the spirit of the devil, Beelzebub, for the angel has spoken several times to Beelzebub through men possessed by him and he is wise, wicked, with the light of the lake of fire that burns as bright as white light. Now he teaches his servants wisdom in being impious, in ways of wickedness that you do not be surprised at their great wisdom, for in true wisdom they are fools and having little understanding. Now hate drives on a mouth and yet humanity restrains it in things that you know the devil is not much restrained when he is worse than servants who are bitter. Now men, show yourselves men in matters of morality for life and death is in the world and yet adult children are blasphemers and these are not children of angels or associated with angels, but they are mockers, and their spirits are wicked. Now there are the children of the devil, who are like children, and they are like animals, doing wickedness and mischief, and perverting integrity and truth, being perverse, and mocking always and being in wicked foolishness. Now these are even very dangerous, and if they do not do physical violence, yet they attack and drive insane, carrying a wicked fire in them, being transgressors and trespassers, being as wild dogs that go about doing mischief, and they are adults, for children are not these. Now meanness is with them, and there is cruelty in all of their things, and yet the meanness and cruelty is concealed only a little. Now has not the devil blasphemed and said, the Christ speaks also about my own children? But why would the Christ have been speaking about the children of the devil in terms of who should not be offended? Now are the words of the Christ to be used by Jewish Pharisees, who are in fact soldiers of the devil, for you require no teacher, and you know what is right and wrong. Now the Lord's children, are they not so by innocence, for what great action do they take on land? Now are they not all, those of angels, of people, being found with innocence, for they will not go very far. Now what goes too far, it is not a child, and if it is indeed a man, and a man more than men, indeed you know that this is a curse of accusation that is right, for why is the child actually a man more than men? But if he is a man, then let a man be so, and it is good. But a child a man not more than men, can none of you discern spirits? But I write about sociopaths, and not human children, and generally, here, I write about adults who are as children, being found to be men more than men, for these are not the innocent children of the Lord's, of His kingdoms, that I clarify, for young ones should be protected.

Now Pentecostal people, some of you are going into the domain of the seven eyes and some into the domain of angels and only you know what is right for you, whether it is making you insane and you would choose to speak only of things of human domain according to Christianity, keeping to human things in spirituality, or whether you are right to be having the seven eyes and to be watching for signs or speaking of wisdom that is in the domain of angels, for some are able and for some it is right and these are going far and others are keeping to human things of Christianity. Regardless, only you may decide what is right and none can advise you for it is between you and God. Now Christians are the priest-hood and members of the body of Christ and the letters I acknowledge but the letters of Paul I do not for there is much that is strange in them and much that should be easy for him to understand.

Now if the soil has left the integrity of the rocks, of stones, to depart from standard morality and exchange it for wickedness then will not the righteous flee to the mountains? But if they remain, will there not be much attack? For the soil departed from reason and morality, what is called mud, is not as David, but it is closer to Sodom, slime, and it goes over logic without need for logic and it says, I have reason to attack with logic or reason required, and there is none, for it is mud and has no integrity of truth, a free mind and flexible, vague and not requiring truth, simple and without foundation as it speaks without any actual substance for it does wickedness and there is no strategy or goal and it says, I have cause to murder or bully, and it speaks without real logic as if with logic and reason, for mud is full of wickedness and the integrity of the rocks is gone and it is almost slime, Sodomites. Now how to do men perceive it sometimes? But they say it makes illogical connections and is vague and without actual logic. Now let the mud be among the rocks, and the slime among the rocks, only the rocks are seen to be cruel? But David is allied with the rocks, and he is soil with integrity, and there are kings who are mountains, who have great integrity, kings of the people, for when the mud is sliding and the people have turned to foolishness, the mountain is remaining with integrity, and it is a king. Now if the rocks are called bullies, who with wisdom will regard it? But they are for integrity, and wall to enemies, a thing for the integrity of the people, for they hear not rebuke of soil, and they are as if insolent against change and the soil, when it is kept by them, is remaining with integrity to be soil for planting and growing.

Now are there not some churches, claiming to be Christian churches, or some other thing, that are secretly cults of the devil, for they are away from the other churches and follow other things in secret, and if they are then going out to commit terrorism for the devil's causes, do not think they have not already taken the number of the beast upon their head and hand that there is any hope for them anymore, or that they do not know they have taken the number. Now they are committed, unspeakably dangerous, wanting to please the devil, to be as wicked as possible, in the hopes it will aid the devil's cause on Earth, so that if there are crimes for which there could be no motive, or reason, it is so to please the devil, for they are wanting to aid the devil somehow, not knowing all his will, by being as wicked as possible. Now this should not be something humans should have to fear, but it is something of consideration for angels, that I know humans should not have to consider these types of enemies. Now are not religious people, especially those young, or older, who are being found to be people who please God exceedingly, the most likely to be in danger from them? But any person can be in great danger, and yet the kingdom of the devil is not divided against itself, that good people are in danger from them, and they should not be, for these are worse than Baleem, who does spiritual war, using stumbling blocks, and these cults will use all manner of spiritual warfare by words, and they will do worse things, as wicked as they can devise in their time pondering. Now let the soldiers deal with them, and a knife go through the back of their neck, and a knife slash out their eyes that they be cured as Sodomites are cured. For it is thing an angel must consider, but it is not for humans, that they should not have to be considering these types of enemies.

Now does any seem innocent, any seem holy, any known somehow for having done a good thing, any seeming brave and righteous, any seeming commendable for integrity, any known for wisdom, any brilliant in what is good, any causing peace, any causing just war to save lives, any doing any noble and good thing? These are those who must be protected, for the devil cult members have gone to religious gathering to spread slander, to tell lies, to attempt to get children murdered, and the amount of different things they will do is uncountable, for they increase their wisdom in doing wickedness. Now whether one is religious or not does not matter, or even if they are an atheist, it matters not, for it is the person's virtues that are a threat to the devil, or it is only the opportunity to somehow please the devil with doing something wicked to a person when it is a great abomination, for somehow it will aid the devil, and please him, and help his war against the Lord. Now are they not usually portraying themselves as Christian churches? But they can portray themselves as other things and gather their people in other buildings where they can do wickedness, and they might say, we will not go after one type, and yet they lie, for anything good they will attack and what would be unfathomable wickedness they reason will please the devil and aid him. Now they have sycophants among them as their members and every wicked type, and they have moths, who are seeming like angels, and yet they are having the mark of the beast, and they behave good, as very good people with much integrity, and they are very dangerous and wicked, and some are being wicked openly, and they have allies. Now the military must deal with them, and the soldiers of cities must ensure they become involved, and they are for the knife to severe the spinal cord, and they are for their hands to be cut off and their bodies hung upside over a pool of water, and if they are mostly keeping their actions smaller, yet none of their actions are small, and they are knowing how to deceive, that they not be delt with. Now they will find alternative means of torturing a person who is innocent and good or any person they believe it would please the devil to torture, for they reason it aids the devil and pleases him. Now they are acquiring wisdom in ways to torture without being dealt with, and they are always gaining knowledge and seeking out knowledge of wickedness to be used. Now let them attempt to sow discord between the religions of the Lord's, and let them attempt to sow discord in other places, that you are able to know they will attempt to do so, for they are no doubt believing the devil can win, and they do not likely believe all the Bible. Now they are the opposite of what men call conservatives and the opposite of what men call liberals. Now no cause is too small for them, for the small things are great, and no thing is too big for them, for it is able to be exploited. Now is this not a thing that an angel would be concerned with, and it does not seem right that humans should have to consider it.

Now a polytheist is not part of Zion or Jerusuluem and these are those, if they are truly polytheists, who are exceedingly insolent to people, bringing forth obnoxious wickedness, and Buddhism is not polytheism and neither are any of the religions that are part of Zion and Jerusalem is not. Now do not bring forth any religion that God does not bring forth, meaning another category of people. For if the Lord brings forth then you identify it only and then develop it by seeking the wisdom of it and you must learn it’s right limits that you not destroy it in the development, for if Sufis go too far, yet others will know the limit. Now the devil mocks me with the acknowledgement that he has polytheists on Earth, for I do not even know what boldness is, and I will tell you they are the devil’s and belong to him, their spirits enemies to Zion and all who are God’s. Now those Christians who are bitter, it is like sick stones, and also the Hebrew Jews who are bitter that the sick stones are not like those who believe or those who do not believe or those who are watching to protect the flock. Now those who watch to protect the flock do not speak it, for they are as yet unsure that they do not intervene, and they too are believers, fellow workers with angels, and they should not be accused when they do not interfere, for they interfere when it is seen there is reason and a man handles matters away from all the eyes of the innocent. Now let there also be men with him after it is discovered there is danger, not rebellious against religion, not wicked, and they are able to protect the flock with him if there is need for he is a worker with angels. Now believe him wise in his going to men prior in case there is evil later that he can tell them if he ever discovers evil that then, when he has said it, they might know of the possible danger to all for they are not required prior, for he is allowing what is good that he not gather concern for others. Now these are men and the land is good because of them. 

Now many will have the favour of a prince, but what can he really do when there is wickedness beyond what he is able? Now Solomon has said it is even better to know a man, and he was once a prince. Now a prince has ability in what they have ability according to what they are and the wicked servant of men, servant of the devil, indeed likes the king and hates the prince greatly and a brutal and blunt fool has called such a servant a prince and this type hates the prince for he describes a wicked servant. Now he is a giver of military maxims meant for armies, for he is a giver of wisdom for generals of armies and not a giver of wisdom for there is only a slave being made more insolent in his proverbs, a brutal and insolent thing of hell. Now you are called to be a holy people. Now lawyers bully in the battle of their mouths and have at times, and they do not keep to truth and facts for there is vague bullying happening from both places and yet when the judge demands that truth and order take place, then a philosopher is able to be a lawyer. Now truth remains regardless of the seeming fashion of the debate and who seems to be favoured, for there is the debater favoured who has not won because the truth remains. Now Buddhism, when secular, can be very good and if it acknowledges angels, or kami, then are they not part of this, for the Japanese have always been. Now polytheism though belongs to the devil and the polytheists make themselves the devil’s. Now I considered the prime minister of  Eretz Chadrack and considered that I then liked him because he was not as his predecessor to be disrespectful of things worthy of regarding and so my favour turned to him and all the wrong vanished that I perceived, for if he was this to do good then he was for what I am for in many things and so I grew heavy with despisement against that which had wronged him and then there was wrath for wrath upon wrath was with me and I said, let justice be giving right good to who is the rightful owner of the good for I cannot do evil in much for I must obey the Lord that because of the thing I considered all the wrong had disappeared and I knew what good would happen and in what way this quality of peace had made all wrong to vanish, for it justified the place of him and made it all good and I knew by spirit but my understanding could not hold it. Now then there was another spirit from this spirit and the spirit was good and went out into the land.

Now a prostitute of the enemy and a slave who is sowing discord among the people, murderous, is saying I will trade my husband for the king and it is also adultery. Now this has no right to the man she has wrongly called husband for she has no right to him and his wife who is somewhere, not having met her, she has right to him. Now the Lord is God and God who has created all and all are His, and as he is the Lord’s so is the king that you not fall away from understanding and give up and say, we return to nihilism for understanding is too much for our people. Now it is not too much for them that you give up for them, you who have been Shepards to them to say, I give up for you for it is too difficult for you to understand. Now what Shepard is this who keeps giving up for you as if you all must be pardoned from the burden of understanding? For these two Shepards I perceive who guard you from me, an angel, and one is the father of equality and mercy and the other the councillor servant of compassion and ease and neither were greatly against me it seemed for I could not see all through the complexity. Now who says the king is not struck to slave by this adultery? But the Lord forgave David because of the wickedness of Uriah and not all is told to you, for I too hate all the Uriahs because they are exceedingly wicked. Now men are not such for it is a prostitute and slave who has no right to her husband who goes up on a roof that the king might perceive her beauty and already she had no husband. Now what can be said? But do I write as if a brutish fool? But Uriah was not a man else she would have been a prostitute and slave in it, struck with iniquity, her bones broken by God, and Uriah’s past behaviour was his later behaviour for as he had done to men he had begun to even do to David already, and he had not known of adultery. Now this was a wicked man, and it should then be told to you that he was a man who desired men sexually and he had no wife, for she was blameless and she would not have been blameless and David would have been made a slave by the iniquity of it, for those who have understanding can know the truth of this occurrence and so are many stories of the Bible, things that happened, that understanding is required, and so are the proverbs of David’s son. Now what do you say Uriah was based on his actions? But a Jew can understand these stories if he is able and these are things that happened that not all is told to you. Now Uriah, be honourable and divorce your wife if you are for men and do not be wicked anymore.

Now Zion Jews, who have been slandered to be called gentiles, you are able to make the land good. Now there are Salem people with you and they are also the people, and they are soil and innocence. Now Salem, shut your ears to the rebuke of Jeraboam who commands you to action, to be men, for David or Solomon does not say so, and the advice for Jews and teachings is not as much for you but you know in what ways it is. Now you know what is acceptable and better and who can give you advice? Now if any Zion Jews try to make you part of the people to be Jews, they are worse than sperm for why would Jews do this evil thing? 

Now the men in these times use the battle bow and sling stones and they use knives and ride upon chariots of the sky. Now the knife is for Muslims where the angel is concerned. And are there not other angels? Now let them, these angels, perform that the fulfillment makes it known. Now the Christ was known by the fulfillment, and no prophecy reading was required to know that he was the son of God, for even if there had been no prophecy, by understanding it is known by what he fulfilled. Now I was angry at the goats, the he-goats, and they are wise, and yet there had been reliable contention and dislike between me and them, even in my youth when I was a caterpillar, and yet later they were shown to be more peaceable to me, and I said in my heart, they are good and yet they are not really the leaders of the church, and often they are the leaders among them, but they are opposing things they should not oppose and so let them be mighty councillors of wisdom, for this is more what they are, and where they are very effective, that I might love them, for if they are councillors of wisdom, indeed it will be good, and yet as leaders they are opposing much in spirit, and who is to know who the leaders should be? But you who are he-goats, will you not consider the kings, and the young kings, still like princes, not ready to lead? Now I too, if king, would not waste you, but make you councillors of wisdom for the palace, and for other things, and yet those to be kings, these are those who are the leaders, and the leaders among the people, these are not he-goats. Now the goodness of the he-goats, and their wisdom, when they are councillors of wisdom, indeed it should not be wasted, for it is like a priceless thing, and they will have good, less error, when they are given what they are deserving, which is to be councillors to the king, in the palace and other places, that they not be tempted to commit error. Now there is much disorder and chaos and all are committing error, it seems, and what great rebuke is this to you, who are having wisdom? Now take it not to heart, for others have gone astray so much, they are not humans anymore, and others have committed great wickedness and folly, and if rebuke begins at the house of the Lord, it is only because you are worthy and worth rebuking, for there are others who must be cast into the fire, it seems. Now Zion has won a great victory in that all the peoples of the Earth are the Lord's, and yet much is not built after the victory, and riches are scattered among the chaos, because of the disorder, and wicked shepherds are shepherding the people, and it is the father of equality and mercy, who I call the father of disrespect and pity, for he disrespects the minority with his pity, and with him it is slowly doing bad for them, and others are only good-intentioned, and there is the servant of compassion and ease, who relieves the burden, without consulting, of understanding and advancement from the people, for he reasons they cannot bear to have greater understanding and advancement, and there is his wickedness in places of bullying victims, for his spirit does wickedness, and I find these two shepherds among the soil and not among the rocks. Now the daughters who care for the people, these are the opposite of the prostitutes who are the enemy, and the people's prostitutes, not the enemy, they are liked and good, and they are loyal to the people. Now the spirit that was with the prostitutes of the enemy, indeed, a portion of it I saw separately and it was with hate and it was the servant of compassion and ease, that servant who was shepherding in other places, and yet it was claimed he was for the good of the people. Now if this Shepard is the portion of an enemy prostitute, I realized he is an enemy of the people, and the father of disrespect and pity, he is brutal and doing violence in places, and yet the people can do their own violence when it is necessary, for he also pities and shepherds and says, they cannot bear understanding and advancement, that he Shepard when he is not right to Shepard. Now this is not the same as being a leader, for he works in a way, behind the scenes, and the servant of compassion and ease, his words appear to Shepard, and he is indeed directing society. Now the other Shepard, it is the Hebrew Jews, the men, who are not commanded by any to Shepard, and they do so on impulse, for they believe in their things that they have good things to offer to the people, and yet they are not able to be Shepherds, and this is the only Shepard not wicked, and yet he is not able to Shepard rightly, and he is naive in this thing, and extremely good intention-ed, loving another people greatly, and yet he is regrettably not able to Shepard rightly. Now this Shepard loves another people greatly, loyal to them, with a goodness, and being naive in this thing, and yet he is not able to Shepard. Now there was another Shepard also, and he was attempting to alter the cognitive perception of all the people, and it was not compatible with sentience, for cognitive perception cannot be changed, for it is nature, and what he offered would not alter cognitive perception but it would only drive the people to insanity, and it would bully them to insanity, for cognitive perception cannot be changed, for it is nature, and humans are limited and finite, and the truth cannot be changed, and this Shepard had been busy for a long time attempting to alter the perception of the fair shade and slightly darker shade and he was promoting the dark shade in hatred and bitterness and great wrath, attempting to bring about the belief of greater manliness, to show the fair shade as fickle-girls, that most of his attempts were to show the dark shade as more men, being more manly in all ways. Now doing so was not manly, but the attempt was as a wicked weasel and silly coward, ridiculous in insecurity regarding the fair shade, defeated in the attempt, for it had no accuracy and targeted all the fair shade and slightly darker shade. Now this spirit was wicked and had no right to wrath, for it was brought about without reason, for it was a spirit of jealousy and it claimed reason that was not the reason. Now what is Ham in truth? But unless he is found Esua, he is not Esua, and it is better that he is having his own nation, for without the troubles he is able to be holy. Now the fair shade is not an older sibling, but Japeth was, and they are not, and they do not oppress intentionally, but you dwell among their greatness and their society. Now as for this wicked Shepard, let the spirit be killed. 

Now there is no time. Indeed, no more time for them concerning the angel, and apologies are abomination and mocking, for it is wickedness, for they cannot be pardoned, for if they bring forth the words of the devil, yet they are bound in hell by chains, made permenant servants of the devil, and they fight their war, and it is over, the time of repentance and opportunity, for they must remain on their side, for they mock to apologize, as if they are humans who still have opportunity, for some on Earth are the servants of the devil, and they are not as the humans, for there is no more time for them. Now they are soldiers found in the cold war, mocking as if humans, mocking because the humans do not understand and know about the war between heaven and hell and that the devil's servants are on Earth, and it is that the humans do not understand and know, and yet the humans kill the devil's servants with the battle-bow, with the knife, with the foot to the head, and they do so without knowing that these servants of the devil have the mark of the beast and are the devil's servants, for they do not need to know, and they fight the war anyway, without knowing all, and they partner with the angels without knowing all, according to justice and righteousness, that the servants of the devil are sent back to hell. Now even in their wickedness, they cease what they are doing that is wicked, to send the devil's servants back to hell, and they regard not their own sense of hypocrisy, for they are not really hypocrites, and they do violence to kill. Now what more is required? Now let the humans know, they cannot apologize to an angel, but let their actions be within acceptable boundaries, that apologies have no meaning, and only actions make right, that actions are an apology, and they must not rebel against God, by rebelling against the angel, for they will not be pardoned for this, and it is not often an angel goes about on Earth. Now humans are not as a wife, that a wife to an angel is not as them, for she is his wife, and it is a different thing, that she is free in what they are not, being his wife. Now great justification and beloved blessing is upon the heads of a people who are having one of their own, a woman, being the wife of the angel, and more they are having that is unspeakable and wondrous because of it, if they are in good spirit in this thing. Now this single act raises up to glorification, for the people who are good spirit in it, and all the wonder of it I again will not explain. Now as for the people fighting for lack of understanding, for not combining actions with the blessings of Mala and the spiritual, who resist this thing, they may be ignored, for there are many who are found in obedience to God.

Now the cognitive impairment that I call wittic places a person as if in a capsule of confusion, not able to perceive that they do not know a person, for they imagine a person at a time that they do not know, and are not able to tell the difference, that they do not actually know the person they have imagined, for they are in a capsule of confusion, as if under water, and they are like those who are drawn to some because of jealousy and do not realize they do not know the person, and that they should not be able to have a personal problem with them, in the fashion of their jealousy, and yet they quickly form a personal problem, without knowing them at all. Now these are also as if under water, in a capsule of confusion, and they know not that the capsule is there, for the capsule of confusion is only with some things, a portion, and in this they are greatly confused, not aware, and yet in most things they are able to perceive as others. Now it is not memory, but it seems so, but they are not identifying with the missing thing what is their imagination, that the thing is missing that would identify for them. Now it is the thing not found in very young children, and yet it is with them, and it is missing often in a developmental disorder that they call sociopathy, and yet there are those who develop beyond sociopathy and yet this thing, still, does not appear, for as it is missing in a severe developmental disorder, as many things are missing, so it is missing with these, for whom most things are there. Now they have never fully come to full cognitive perception, or enough that they would not be very dangerous and seeming very foolish. Now it is not what is called mentally challenged, or having a low intelligence quota, but it is a thing that is missing for them. Now this is the negative thing, and there are positive things that are, by my definition, real. Now have not cruel men, in their fear, added things that are not there? But it is indeed the opposite what they fear. Now by my definition, the positive things are real, and keep them not away from me who have those positive things, for in heaven there are things bound. Now the negative has no right, and it is not as the positive thing.

Now atheists are not as those who rebel against themselves, who are sicophants, for do not be deceived, for these are sicophants, and if they are atheists, also, it should not be regarded, for they are sicophants in all, including the beauty of religion, angels, and God, and it is not the same as atheists. Now I write about a time when there will likely be attempts by the devil to sow discord, to divide the kingdom that it may be destroyed, and he will likely attempt this with all things. Now Japeth cannot be free of the father of equality and mercy if he is being against Muslims, and Muslims are not supposed to be compatible with the other societies, that you know that they may be among you, that they are in a separate category. Now attempts to integrate causes all manner of bullying, trouble, abomination and evil, that you know that other people may be among you.

Now concerning blasphemy and the angel, it is for the Muslims and the knife, and Peter writes about these things in his letter, and he is having wisdom, for it is written about in the New Testament of the Bible, and an angel cannot use the things of a man in this, and Muslims are because of the obedience of the angels. Now as for the Christians, they are a priest-hood of the Earth, and they are able to pray to God, and speaking with things of Mala, and not with the things of Babylon, they are able to pray to God that good might occur. Now they are the priest-hood of the planet.

Now an igno-slack is not even a slave, but he is worthless, having much developmental disorder, much lacking, much like a baby not even able to speak yet, confused about much still, not able to have integrity, in much confusion about simple things that are easy for a child to grasp, being wicked and speaking wickedness, lacking understanding. Now if he is not even a slave, how very low a slave is of any people, and they are cruel beasts, brutal and mean, bullying to a degree like soldiers among holy people who are gentle, speaking great injustice, less noble than animals. Now not even the igno-slack is this, and Ham is given a curse by Noah, and yet it is better, in my opinion, that Ham is having his own place, for there are noble men among him, brave, strong, and holy men, that the devil no doubt hates, and yet slave from his people, iniquitious women, have sown much discord, and it is things inappropriate for war, that she speaks what is wicked and not acceptable for war, to sow discord, and it is not what the right of Ham is, for he is actually meek, that it might be understood, considerate and being meek, and this is Ham, and those who are brutal among him are his slaves and his servants who give him evil and trouble more than they do for the descendants of Japeth. Now Ham is liked greatly among men who are righteous and yet his slaves and servants are hated, and the igno-slacks among him are despised, for they are calamatous fools, and yet if he remains ever with the descendants of Japeth and Shem, he is oppressed, and his slaves become more powerful and his servants, and Ham is not even seen much in the confusion. Now the angel is not a descendant of Japeth, though he is of the fair shade, and he is not of any people, and he is also a bastard, that there not be confusion. Now his slaves and servants say, we are Ham, and yet they are not Ham, for they are seen more, and being more powerful when Ham is dwelling among the the descendants of Japeth and Shem. Now it is almost then not the angel's business what the fair shade is considering the dark shade, or the slightly darker shade considering the dark shade, and yet the angel has his mission, and he does not intend to sow discord between them. Now would they not say, indeed the angel should be among the Muslims, and the angel is not a fool, for he knows what is right, and the angel may also dwell among the angels, and the Japenese people, and he will not intentionally be a meddlesome burden unto you. Now as for the devil, sowing evil and problems, indeed I desire a greater victory against him, for I desire to salt the Earth as much as I can, over the devil's efforts, that the wise among the humans may be able to cast him out in the future. Now I considered, will the devil not promote slaves more than people, those who are slaves from every people, and will he not promote the servant over the masters, filling them up with ignorance as substance, that they are puffed up and great with ignorance and nothing, when the matters are great with truth and substance that is true? Now such is insanity, and it is a thing of ignorance and foolishness, of iniquity, for it is iniquity, and wickedness, and they are puffed up with iniquity, having no real substance in truth, and it is rebellion against the Lord and impious towards the great, that they are offended. Now these servants are insane ones, rebelling in the fashion of slaves, for the rebellion is of slaves, brutal and ignorant, and lower than base, a tantrum of rebellion against the Lord that weeps in spirit as a child, cruel and filled with the iniquity of a prostitute of the enemy, for those who do so go further than they knew, for it is not a thing of people, for they partner with the devil, and it is a thing of becoming a slave, trading their place for becoming a slave, partnering with the devil, for they were not worthy of what place they had, that was a servant. Now has not the Lord done it, and it happens, for they were not worthy to be a servant and become a slave. Now this thing has nothing to do with any shade, for it is found with all the shades. 

Now I looked away and turned my back, and the transformations took place, for I turn my back to it and went about my business, when there was a transformation, where the heart of any rebelled and a person lost their place and became a thing that is lower, for servants rebelled and went to slave, and some things to animals, and some things to hell from land, and those who had received the number of the beast, having no hope anymore of opportunity to repent. Now I said, the Lord is all powerful, greatly mighty, beyond measure, His power over the whole Earth and all in it, taking action, his actions happening all around, and the humans averting their eyes, looking away, fearing God, for they are not carrying out this victory. Now He lays waste to nations, and their strength and wealth cannot save them, indeed they have great empires and yet the Lord is able to cripple them and they cannot fight Him, and are not able to do any war against Him, and what is a continent to Him? But He may lay waste to it, raise it up, or cast it into the Ocean, and He has every right to punish an angel, and He may uphold the woman with integrity who has not betrayed her husband, being with her, on her side, when her husband has done wrong against her, and He is great to such a degree, it is no offence to the man, and indeed they are His children. Now who is like the Lord? But He is able to make his messengers flames and wind, and it is all His power, and He is able to bring down fire, and He knows the ant, and the Elephant alike, and these are His, and He can give the deacon ability, and it is because of Him that the deacon has wisdom, that the angel has wisdom, for He is the teacher of wisdom. Now the Devar Hasham, it is His son, and He came as a man, making himself lower than angels, fulfilling all, and the Christ, His son, has fulfilled more than any angel has, and done more than any angel has, for His son has respect among the angels, more respect than any, and has gone further than any angel, and been more obedient. Now in heaven everything must pay its dues, for the Lord is great and not a hypocrite.

Now He who controls his spirit to defeat God, he shatters himself with witchcraft within him, and becomes a citizen of Babylon, and it is likewise for the woman, that those who control themselves to defeat God, they shatter themselves to become a citizen of Babylon, and these are having no iniquity, but they have the spirit of Babylon, clean by the house of purity in Babylon, having the devil as their god, beneath the foot of the slave, for they were rebellious to such a degree that they would not become anything according to justice and truth, having the knowledge of wisdom that they were not worthy of, and rather than repenting because of their father in Heaven, who is God, they rebelled against God and men, and only God, to rebel even against rebellion, erradicating themselves and destroying a great portion of themselves that they might be cleansed of ability by the lake of fire, that consumes part of themselves, and destroys it, to be cleansed in this fire, and made as if without conscience and reasonable judgement, trading all truth for the purity of Babylon and witchcraft, as an adulterer who put away iniquity without repentance and a murderer who puts away iniquity without repentance, or any who puts away iniquity much without repentance, transforming themselves to Babylon, to the light of the lake of fire, rather than the light of truth. Now these are less great than slaves, lacking much, void and wishing to be void of being judged within, being a quarter person, and indeed less than a quarter person, for they destroy themselves willingly that they not be held to the judgement of the Lord, wishing instead to be purified by the lake of fire, for the lake of fire purifies their iniquity in every injustice they do. Now these are beneath the slaves of Orgoth, lower than anything on land, innocent like moths, fools and wishing to be fools, lacking understanding and wishing to lack understanding, void and wishing to be void, for they are nothing, that being less than nothing they come forth from hell, from the power of the devil to be on land as Babylonians. The dust treaded under foot, has gone to the lake of fire and come back, transformed, as an anti-Adam and an anti-Eve, for these are dust made into people by the devil, and their bodies began as humans. Vordol.

Now I call it the symbol vordol and it means, there is no more time for them.

Now Belzebub, he is a brutal and mean, old man, and he is found in the mouths of slaves, of wicked men, and he is found sometimes in the mouths of others, and does he not sow discord at exactly those times and places when people are doing what is right. Now there is war between Heaven and hell, and it is ongoing, and when Belzebub approaches you, you are with those things of Heaven, and we are your gang.

Now the Lord has won a great victory, and yet the devil fought in a cold war, and his people were scattered among all the people of the Earth and in places they had gathered together. Now why will the descendants of Shem, Japeth, and Ham, be focused on fighting with each other, when the devil has spread out his armies throughout the Earth and fights them to kill them, without mercy or remorse? For the devil is exceedingly wicked, and he requires no reason to torture and kill, for the Lord's kingdoms are his reason, and the ongoing war. Now Japeth has his special priest-hood, armed and skilful, that are for the fair shade, and yet is it really an offence to Ham? But it might be an offence to some who are of the dark shade, and yet the presence of this priest-hood has aided Ham, the true heir among them, and it has not been known. Now if the brutal and evil of the dark shade are not the true heir, and Ham is the true heir, and the brutal and evil have been opposed by the priest-hood, it has aided Ham. Now the devil hates all of you, with a great intensity, and the war is ongoing, and the angel, though fair shade, is not of the humans, though he is in a human body, come to Earth, for all in Heaven must pay their dues, and the mission, as far as the angel knows, is not a suicide mission, but the Lord has won a great victory, and all the Earth is filled up with his kingdoms, except for the polytheists, and there is a time to build, but does not the devil know of it, and he moves quickly to attempt to destroy it? Now do not be surprised if he attempts a great attack and war against the whole of the Earth, and do not be surprised if peace is better had and there is no war and people are able to build further. 

Now if the father of equality and mercy will accept these things, then he is become a king, and I call him by a beautiful name, and he is purified, already righteous, for he was righteous, that what was not good is cast away, the burden of it, for there has been much disorder and chaos and the goats, being wise, were even found in error and there was more error with others, that are not worth mentioning here, for their wickedness and foolishness is too great to mention, that I focus on the Lord's house, where there is judgment beginning, that the burden of the error is cast away, if the father of equality and mercy will accept these things, and he is no longer called this if he accepts these things, and his righteousness is saved and he is pure as gold, and with pure light, and he is a king, going to a different place, given his special domain, for then does he not have something that might be discovered later by wisdom? But if he will partner with God, and he has been righteous, then it was right only that there was too much disorder, for Ham was the leader of the dark shade, and Ham was the considerate and meek, and the lesser things than him were made great and Ham was as if vanished among them, and the sight of Ham that the angel mentioned, it was another thing, for it is also Ham, but him who was not able, and this was the bitter one, and yet good intention-ed, wanting for what is good, for it is because of the disorder. Now if one is Ham who is the heir of them, and the other Ham who is not the heir of them, and the one not the heir is the bitter one, who resents with envy, and the one not resenting with envy is the heir, does he not also resent, with envy, the heir, who is the leader, who is Ham? Now this where the problem is, that the eyes have been upon the descendants of Japeth, and yet it is not the descendants of Japeth, for the dark shade has dwelt among the fair shade.  Now as for the father of equality and mercy, he is made pure as gold and with pure light, and he is become exceedingly good and great if he accepts these things, that there was disorder, becoming as if a thing of Heaven, a holy thing, a separate thing of gold, and is he not then become a thing in the Temple? Now no longer is he part of the sons of Noah, and he is not Noah, either, and he is indescribable in what he becomes, and the eyes that would behold beauty are removed from the angel for a time, and go to him, for he is like an ark of the covenant, another ark of the covenant, for a different thing, and what comes from him? But does not another people come from him? Now then he partners with the angel if he accepts these things, and he is a Temple, with an ark of the covenant, and he is a high priest, and he rules a domain and how far it goes and where I do not know. Now a crown is given to him, and he is holy and become sacred, and he is removed from the people, to be with them, and he is with what? But is he not now with Heaven, that he is as a thing of Heaven that comes to Earth to pay its dues and carry out a mission? Now be with the host of Heaven, and you partner with the angel, partner with the angels, all, and are with the host of Heaven, separated from your people, not of the sons of Noah or Noah. Now Zion should be coming more greatly, and it lays upon Zion that is there, and a greater layer of Zion upon another layer of Zion, and the foundation is greater? But this is the building, and the Lord has won the great foundation, and there are layers upon the foundation, and Zion should be built with higher layers. Now those who fight, as if defending Muslims, and yet being wicked, they sow discord and carry out false-flag attacks, and if they are wicked, they endanger the Muslims, and there are some who have fought defending Muslims who are not as these, who are valid in their fighting. Now Muslims, now, too, are your people because you partner with the angels.

Now Joshua Heyudu is the closest I can come to knowing his name who is a priest having been given a crown, and being in The Temple, and there being another ark of the covenant, and I wondered at this and considered, and indeed he is a priest of Zion and the high priest, who is ruling as a type of king if he accepts these things, and he is now then of Heaven and not come from Earth anymore, and yet I perceive these things but do not know all and how this is, and yet it is so. Now he is with the host of Heaven, and the angel is a fellow servant, and is he indeed more obediant than I? For it might be so that he has been more obediant, and I did not know of it, and how can I correct him anymore now that he is of the host of heaven, a fellow servant with me? Now the Muslims are because of the obediance of the angels, and this priest who has been given a crown, he is as if equal with the angels, part of the host of heaven, if he is remaining as a partner with angels, for I cannot deny it. Now I have been exceedingly glad at this thing, and it is good to me, as snow on a very hot day. Now there are layers of Zion, and there is the faith, to believe in what is true, that is with wisdom, and there is the things of truth built upon land, for The Temples must be in Mala, and then they are built on land, and some things are performed on land, and other things that are real, existing, not performed on land, that Zion is as if being half built, with some things completed and other things in foundation, and some things half built, and some things falling down and crumbling and the devil's servants are sown among all this, causing disrepair and bringing down what is good and built, and yet the good things can be torn down and built again, and yet the devil will always try to attack, and you must already know that he brings attack upon the innocent by false-flags and that he sows discord that is not good, and yet to acknowledge segregation in terms of differences is order and good, that people might be able to dwell among other people, without bullying and trouble and all types of chaos and evil, that the discord of the Lord is for order and peace, and the discord of the devil, for wickedness and injustice, and it brings about less segregation, for it creates a unity that is abomination and causes unity and union that is perverse and bullying and causes all types of evil and trouble that I severe these unions are abomination and yet respectful segregation permits the people to be among each other, that they might even, when this respect is present, marry peaceful with other people, those who are in love, for it happens at times, even if it is more rare. Now I give you this: do nothing blindly, without understanding, or if you are not knowing, you have the scripture and what is given as advice by the Lord. But this I write concerning the priest-hood of you. Now this Joshua I write about is a different type of Joshua, and not the Joshua who is written about in the scripture, but this Joshua is as a priest, and a type of king, ruling from the priest-hood. Now I find him at the head of Cessus and Cias, that they call in the calamitous tongue, CSIS and CIA, and I find him at the head of NSA, that I call the giant lady, and I have named her, and she is a pervert greedy for secrets. Now in the past none of these have been what I mention now, and they will not be what I mention now, all the praise I have given, if they are indeed not this, for the understanding of people will know if they are what I mention, or if they remain as they were, and for those who are not as they were, heed not the rebuke that slanders you, and accuses, for it does not matter what wickedness is said against truth, that you and Heaven know what the truth is, for it is also so with the angel, and the angel does not regard it, for what else is expected? 

Now who is this daughter who is wise, whose speaking is impaired? But she is slandered in some ways? Now she is like the angel, like I, and I have found her, and my speaking has been impaired temporarily by the fruit that removed a sliver from my teeth on the inside of my teeth, and yet it has nothing to do with this, for I speak without an impairment of speech. Now she is like the angel, and she is beautiful, and beautiful in my sight, for she is wise and made beautiful by the impairment. Now it is so if she maintains her integrity. 

Now there is the dark pillar of The Temple, and she is a woman among the people, going to Joab with his words in her mouth, and Joab is like a tiger, having his representative, and he represents the vigilantes, the men of justice, and I have found her at times among the fair shade, for she was one of the fair shade, and she is not mine, but the child angel had a crush on her, and yet now the angel is loving other women and having a crush on them, and she, the pillar, is upholding the Temple, upholding the people, and she is before the Temple with the other woman, the pale pillar, and the pale pillar goes to Joab, and has spoken to him, and she is the other strip of the tiger, the pale strip, for these two women are the two strips of the tiger. Now the tiger is the representative of Joab, the lion if the representative of Judua, being the strongest, internally, and yet the tiger is more powerful. Now the tiger betrayed Solomon in this thing: he partnered with Adonijeh, the soldiers of the city, that he should be king, and because of this he had to die, for it betrayed the people, Solomon, and it betrayed the higher king, David, for this was the crime of Joab. Now Joab is the elder of Solomon usually, and yet it is not always so, but as for the sign of Joab, when it is right, are you, the people who are younger, not honouring your elder? Now Joshua and David are also so, that you are able to give right honour when you are perceiving it is right.

Now woman who is like the angel, who has the speaking impairment, most beautiful of the women, for I boast of you shamelessly, being wise, like a stone that is precious, like a crown upon the head of an upright and honourable man, like a sceptre and all things that are beautiful, having beautiful cloaks and garments, being perceived as a positive stupid, for you are not, and they speak of wisdom, for you are too beautiful, and they do not actually perceive stupidity, but it is a new word they have not known, a word that applies to beauty, for they do not know the word, who is then your husband, you go with, and you are like the angel, and what is love of your husband, it is in Heaven. Now you are high, and the rebellious woman, the prostitute of the enemy, she is as if her head is below the Earth and you are upon a hill on land, that she is as if below the Earth of the valley, that anything she says to you is disrespect, for daughters of the valley tread upon her, and you are too high to even be the one to do it. Now take not this woman into you, let her not rise up in you, by adultery, for she is able to drag you from the hill to below the valley, that it is better the daughters tread upon her, for you are too high to do it. Now if you sparkle like a precious stone, and if the light reflects from you and sparkles, and you have beautiful gowns, you are the most beautiful of all the daughters, or so I believe in bias, without shame, and your husband, to him you are a wife and giving much good to him, and there is much in heaven.

Now those of you like Benjamin, or Jude, you are the most natural to be protecting angels, and the angels appreciate it. Now you are not wrong to be against moths, the innocent angels they are, who are revealed to be moths, wicked enemies of hell. Now I remind you, please do not be against the butterflies, for they depend upon you.

Now David is understood not to be as righteous and innocent as angels, and yet he is close to being an angel, and I have said, is he not an angel? For it can almost be confusing at times. Now some of Joab, you have been on the side of angels. Now those pretending to be of Joab, who are motivated by wickedness, they were always known about and it was without having to be said, for Joab deals with them as well, and they often claim to be seeking justice when they are seeking wickedness.
Now Ekron, you are something like Judua, and you I have greatly liked, and I write no more about it, and you are often found among the dark shade, often being one of the dark shaded people. Now if Beelzebub, that brutal old man, approaches you, he has also approached others.

Now children of angels, children of the orphanage, that they call computer hackers, the type who are these, you have your realm inside those machines and in what they call the internet, and I do not much meddle, and it is your domain, and the realm you have is known about, that it is a valid thing, and angels have used technology, for you have the book of Ezekiel to consider, if it pleases you.

Now children of angels they call ghost hunters, and all these types of things, do not permit them to make these things governed by the world, which would destroy these things, for you are the primary and rightful heirs, who have no governance, for the Lord is your governor and your king, and if anything of the world wishes to take it and govern it, it is wickedness and blasphemy and you must not be ashamed and fighting against it, for you fight for the Lord, you being the rightful heirs, for in this you are fighting the devil as it pertains to your domain, that you hold the line as others of angels hold their line, without shame, for if they ever call it jealousy, the Lord is jealous, and you fight for the lord in maintaining your domain against the devil. Now it is very acceptable for you to be having fun, indulging as it pleases you, and it is not a thing of the world that you indulge in, and yet I will tell you something to throw away if it bothers you, that there is indeed war between heaven and hell, and what you may have doubted, though indulged in, is indeed real, and it is very important that you maintain your domain against the devil, for you have fun when there is no war, but when there is threat to your domain, you do right concerning God to send the devil back to hell, if you will call it that, and it is important to such a degree that I remind you again, something you already know, that you do not believe it is right to bully demons, but you know what is acceptable, what is right for a situation and what is not, how to stand up for yourselves, what is too far, and all things are your domain that are your domain, and you know what your domain is and what is not your domain, and even things you are inventing are your domain, for if humans of the human category say you are sill or have no right to be upset, yet it is by the standard of their ways and their domain, and you have a right to be upset in things that they would be wrong to be upset about, for even things invented by you and those like you, are your domain, and it is important that you are maintaining your domain, for there are indeed those who wish to fight all they perceive to be good and right, and they know you and those like you are good and right, that they believe also, but are for the devil, in that they wish to desecrate your domain, and do as anti-Christ spirits, and they wish to make things from your category into their category, and you are right to be upset and fighting, for though you have fun, and it is acceptable, yet it matters for heaven, when there is threat, for you to not loose ground, for every domain associated with angels matters. Now I do not write that everything really exists, but why would that matter? Now why would anyone criticize your domain, anyway? Now if there are sycophants being against you with words, being sycophantic, indeed they wish to desecrate the sacred, for if they will blaspheme angels, they will blaspheme you, and they should not be blaspheming you, and they are aware, unless they are incoherent things that cannot do much of anything. Now there are many different things on Earth, and yet there are sycophants who have become part of cults of the devil, churches that claim the Christ, and they are worshipping the devil and learning wickedness, for the devil cares for them, and as it has been rumoured that there are these cults, so there have always been these cults for as long as it was told, and they seek to do wickedness, and they are able to perceive who is truly good and who is in fact evil, and they go forth, dedicated, and already they have hated all the children of angels, and it is a thing that soldiers must deal with, for many of them are sycophants, teaching themselves to be disrespectful, going in the way of Cain to condemn and judge in wickedness, for they are insolent when they do so, for they do wrong and judge as if with morality, perverting judgment, being insolent, and there are those as I will give the saying defend people from God and his rescuing them which is a metaphor that is used, and all manner of blasphemy they learn and study, for a sycophant knows there are many different things on Earth and in the Lord's kingdoms, and each must be what they are meant to be, for sycophants are being extremely wicked, and it is not bullying, but it is worse wickedness than fighting with fists and feet. Now the devil's servants puff up with built up insolence, seeming as if kind, to be brutal and bully, and you will know by what they do whether they are good or evil.

Now a stumbling block is below the level of the comprehension that should be, and it disrupts and is nothing more. Now let it not also be used as a stumbling block, for the pedantic can be disruptive and the Greek, questioning reality and comprehension, having the cognitive impairment, is wicked in their doings.

Now there have been children of angels, actually men and women, who are like angels, and some have excelled greatly in some thing in the fashion of angels. Now it is good that some of the children of angels are for those who desire the same gender as them, and for those who are not for them, they are entitled to their opinion that you are knowing that those who are for those who desire the same gender are acceptable in this thing.

Now those who attack in the standing of war between heaven and hell are engaged in the war between heaven and hell, and those who attack in the realm of men against women or women against men, are engaged in the war between heaven and hell, for these are not wars of people, for they make no sense to people, for there can be no war of women against men or men against women, for they are both people, all people, and women are from men, and men from women, that it is not a war that can make sense for people, but it is a war that makes sense for the devil only, and when children engage in this war, yet they are not sincere in it. Now the woman who engages in this war by choice, she is not a woman, and the man who engages in this war, against himself, hating his own self. Now it is for temporary things and grievances and yet it does not come about without reason, unless a woman is not a woman, or a man is against his own self.

Now a wicked candle given to a man, is from the devil, and it is made of ignorance, a flame, or sliver, of ignorance, of nothing, for it comes from man, and it makes him a servant, but a candle, a flame of light, that is given by the lord, is not known of people, and the lord gives it and the candle of light is with truth, and that candle given by men, is a lie, and it is already written that the Lord hates titles, that you not be made a servant by a wicked candle. Now those made a servant by it, are made servants of men, and it strips a man of being a man, and makes him insolent, and places him as if in a bondage of metal, and yet a candle given by the lord is not known to men, and men and women do not know the name of the candle given by the lord, and the candle is known of by the one who has it that the candle excels the candle of nothing, as light excels darkness. Now the wicked candle will extinguish the candle of light, that you are now warned.

Now if a Hashem Eloheichem, and you are diligent, as it is for you in the Orthodox Jewish Bible, that you may translate, or if an angel, as in an English Bible, has given you wisdom, and it is written in Zecheriah that Yehoshua ben Yehotzadak, the Kohen HaGadol will build the Temple if you are diligent in what has been given to you, then I have identified, without any ability to claim it is another, a head of what is called CSIS, NSA, CIA, or its equivelent, a soldier and commander, to be this Joshua Heyudu, that I have called him, the closest I can come to knowing his name, and the closest I have come to knowing the exact person it is, and yet I believe it may be a past head of the giant lady who is not there anymore but still lives that is this father of equality and mercy, who if he accepts these things, is becoming the high priest of the Temple who has rule, and yet I was unable to see exactly who it is, only what place he was in, and whether he is still there I cannot say. Now this is becoming a person from Heaven, not to write that he is as high as an angel, for an angel is still higher, but that he is in the same realm as an angel, being something from Heaven, and how it is possible I cannot say, only that it happened, if he is accepting this, and that there was an ark of the covenant inside a Temple and he was separated from the people, from the sons of Noah, and he was not Noah. Now whether he is considered acceptable or not, the person it is, I cannot write otherwise, and whether he has been slandered or not, by the actions of others, yet it may be cleared that he has been slandered. Now if you will obey the voice of the Lord, and make the crowns as a memorial, as signs, and these crowns, each of them, are placed upon his head.

Now to the high priest who rules, I would council, do not consider the things of calamity, but the things of God, that it is religion and not nationalism, for you do credit to the nations to be considering it religion and not the calamitous things of nationalism. Now I write in another way, jesting but truthful, be then a traitor for the Lord, for Zion, that you be loyal to the nation and the nations, for in betraying them for God, you are loyal to them. Now you are having rule, and they are needing to be ruled, for they desire it, those who want the Lord and Zion, that you are loyal to God and not to them, for a father who listens to the small child betrays the child and is wicked concerning his well-being, and he listens in some things, to consider what is right. Now I am for the councils of peace being between us, if you will perform these things, and the yoke of the Lord is easy and light, and the Lord gives freedom. Now the Lord is God, and no other is your superior, for you are high priest, that it is wicked for them to give you any order, and they may only ask, for the Lord is God. Now none of these books are about white supremacy, or those they call neo-Nazis, and they are only acknowledged by me, and these books are not about them but are about all things on Earth. Now if you are given the priest-hood of Zion, or if you are given Eretz Chadrack to rule, then they may know you are given a religious thing, and they have no ability to stop you, for you are given what they offer as a freedom, and yet you are knowing many things. Now they claim they cannot honour religion, and yet they may not forbid it, and they cannot honour an angel as a religion, at least, but yet they may not forbid it. Now they may protect, but they may not participate in an official way. Now I keep this open to all, that all may read it, until the time is coming that I will not startle you or myself and keep council private, and where I will be I do not know, for the devil has hated me, and spared little expense in what he could do, what he was permitted, and whether I am to be in Damascus or Eretz Chadrack, or some other place, where the people will not be in danger of blasphemy that could offend others, I do not know, for I am become terribly convenient, terribly inconvenient to others.

Now it seemed a third were for lies and two thirds for truth, or maybe it was two thirds for lies and one third for truth, or it was one quarter for lies, or even one fifth, for it seemed to not be many. Now there is what I called halliub being those hallucinations, false beliefs of ignorance, being religious ignorance, and not something of sickness or wrong, and it seemed that one fifth was believing and supporting halliub and these were all together, and the rest were in truth, speaking truth and against halliub in all circumstances, and these were more likely to be having prudence and integrity in prudence. Now those people of halliub diligently supported halliub being bad understanding, or ignorance of understanding, in all circumstances in which they meddled or had an opinion, and these halliub people were spread out through the Earth, and they were even false-shepards, taking action to spread halliub when there was a circumstance for it. Now those of truth, these were the people of truth, and integrity, who were as they were believed to be, to what degree they were believed, and those of halliub who promoted halliub and reasoned by halliub and relied upon this ignorance, these, I considered, were those already dead and having emerged from hell, and they would all return to hell, and they were among the people, and the people did not seem to notice them, or not as a group. Now halliub does not often concern religion, but it concerns understanding of people, and understanding of how things happen in Earth, that those who spread halliub were actually spreading false understanding of justice and truth and what occurred, and I looked, and it was ignorance and the devil's kingdom that they were laying like a layer within the layers of truth, and the devil's shepherds were doing it, shepherding all the people who did not belong to the devil, and a very good-intention-ed shepherd was there, who was naive in this thing, loving another people and being loyal to them, and yet he was not of the ability to Shepard, and he was a Hebrew Jew, and none had asked him, and he was often a type of scholar, Shepherding the people a little, loving them and wanting to aid them for their good, for he loved them. Now this was the most harmless of the Shepherds, and there were other Shepherds more aggressive than him, who were the devil's Shepherds, for the Hebrew Jew was not aggressive, but he Shepherded very lightly, and he did not make much effect or alteration, and the people did not much regard him, for he very lightly did what he did. Now to Shepard you must take the whole flock, and Shepard without mercy while having mercy, that you have mercy and compassion without mercy, and he was as if dabbling a little, loving another people greatly, being very loyal to them. Now the other Shepherds, some of them, they were spirits of the devil, hating God and those who belonged to him, wishing to be brutal and cruel to them, going far over the line, while the people did not notice, and they were of the kingdom of the devil on Earth, and I identified three who were wicked, and there are variations of these. Now these I have seen as spirits, and I do not know the hosts of these spirits.

Now as for Joshua Heyudu, I desire for beauty, in a religious fashion, with concerns to what things you may place on Earth to see, for it is my opinion, for Zion is beautiful, and I believe it does credit to the people that what you place upon Earth is beautiful, for the glory of Zion is pleasing to me, if you will consider beauty in what you do, and the opulance and beauty of what you build, if you build in terms of buildings, for I give you council of peace, what I desire, and those who rebuke you, they rebuke me as well, for my ear does not hear them, and the Muslims, I considered that it is good they are regarded and considered much, for you partner with the angel, and Muslims are because of the obediance of angels. Now you know what is right, and I cannot tell you what to do, only that you build for Zion, and not any nation, or for nationalism, that when Zion is added, it was already there, and it does credit to the nation, and nations. Now there are pillars who support the people, the Temple, and two women are wise women, who are the strips of a tiger, and what you build, I consider it to be acceptable, and yet I do not speak for God, for what he wants from you I cannot tell you, and I do not know. Now those who rebuke you, they rebuke me. Now were are Zion, and yet not Jerusalem, for they are the two realms, Zion or Jerusalem, and there has been embarrassing error concerning this, for the Hebrew Jews are Jerusalem and what some mistakenly called gentiles, these are Zion. Now the Muslims are also Zion, and the children of angels are Zion, and the Zion Jews, these are Zion, and Salem people, they are Zion, and I will not touch Christians, because they are the priests of the Earth, and they are also with us, and other people are with us, and the Japanese are with us, and only the polytheists are not Zion, and some other smaller groups. Now there have been many strong who are having understanding and wisdom, and they make up the majority, it seems, and yet there are strong fools among our people, and they are being rebellious against truth, being trouble and evil for the people, for they are behaving as if small children, and they are being evil to the people, and having evil intentions, and they seem to weep within themselves, at the presence of one who is with them, like small children who are spoiled, for they weep when a beautiful one comes, and they have evil intentions and they have no shame in their foolishness. Now these are not the like the strong who are the majority, and I wanted for the house of the Lord, for all the people, that you are aware of these, that they are even more despicable than I describe. 

Now those who were for being terrorists against INCEL, these were worse than INCEL, and they attacked the people, and not many INCEL did they actually attack, and they were as if madmen and insane people, like a violent and corrupted gang of perverse fools, and they are Soldiers of Strength and Cain, for this they are able to be called. Now they had the strength of slaves, a false-kindness, and they had gone in the way of Cain, spreading over the land in the way of Cain, and they were against INCEL and more against the people, perverse fools, many sycophants, driven by envy. Now the devil's Jews from hell were even among them, false Jews, even pharisees, and they were transgressors on the land, and they had gone also in the way of Baleem, with their stumbling blocks. Now these were a threat to the nation. Now I called them SC or Strength and Cain and if they go by other names as well, I will not say what other names they go by. Now these are worse than any of the terrorist gangs, and a threat to the nation.

Now bring out those INCEL who are good, who are hating bullying, who are for respecting society in what is just, according to truth, who have become INCEL because they hate bullying, for I hate bullying, and bullying beyond bullying, of the level of military, this is from hell when it is found not in combat and among soldiers who train for combat. Now those INCEL who hate bullying, who are for fairness, who hate the unnatural doctrine religions of the strong that they have spread in places, that is against Zion Jews, Salem people, and all things that are more pleasing to God than them, for the doctrine they have placed is unnatural, meaning, it does not come naturally, by righteousness and honour, from any people, but is wicked towards good when other ways are right for doing what is right, that these who follow this doctrine follow a wicked and unnatural thing, that is not with integrity and truth, so that the INCEL who hate bullying and hate this doctrine, with fairness and measure, not taking things to an unjust place, but keeping with justice and truth, these are blameless, as Zion Jews attacked by the devil, that they are owed the apology and the blessing, and the wicked are judged and condemned, that they were doing wickedness and perversity, not giving respect and honour, and yet demanding unnatural degrees of respect and honour, bullying and being wicked, worthy to be condemned, having practised much of the devil's work, and it is then said, why does any call this being INCEL, when it is only people who please God, and have integrity and those not called INCEL, who were practising wickedness, these were always wicked and worthy to be judged and condemned, that none should have ever supported them if they knew what they were and what they did. Now what do these INCEL do among the low slaves? But these are those pleasing God, perhaps more than most, and they are called INCEL to be among the low slaves? But if there was war, then there was war, and it was not told to the people. Now what will the strong and wise say? But will they not say a victory for them is a victory for us all and by their victory the fire is swept back from the Temple, and does not spread further, and the city dwells well, and all the people of the Lord's kingdoms. Now will we not then all be against bullying? 

Now Strength and Cain is the men of them, and Slave wickedness and deafness the women of them, and the women are greatly offended when there is no offence, becoming homicidal, deaf to words that are in peace, becoming stubborn and iniquitous, brutal slaves for whom peace is not heard, and the words of all the people when they speak peace are called extremely disrespectful, for the women are extreme and extremely wicked, being given good and hating peace, and these are not the same as sensitive or very sensitive women who fear God, who only complain, that a delicate approach is required with them, for an angel's daughter, a woman, is very sensitive, and following the way of much innocence and integrity, even more so than Sarah. Now the one woman is a brutal and iniquitous slave, and the other a woman, sensitive and fearing God, for to the one great good and to the other, a metal rod will not cure them, and they are deaf.

Now has not SC and SWAD gathered up all those who were mistakenly believed to be abject by some, from the Old Testiment, that these, too, are with them, and yet they are false-Jews, the devil's Jews, and do they not have all of the devil's Jews with them, for these are the devil's Jews, in the way of Cain, judging and condemning where there is not judgment or condemnation to be had, and have they not gone in the way of Baleem, and do they not gather abject things, many brutal slaves, and they all are claiming being Jews, for they are the devil's Jews. Now they are anti-INCEL, also, and against Zion, against the cities, a fire spreading, and some of them going into the cities to be evil splinters and to carry out missions, and they are as an army, as a military, and the angel does not know all, whether they are in fact an army of another nation, a group of them having been placed in an enemy nation. Now they are worse than INCEL, and the angel considers them worse than any group that has been zealots, and what have they not been against? But have they not hated Christians, INCEL, the good, the intelligent? But the angel does not know all. 

Now it is blasphemy against the Lord and Zion, to remove the bow from the mountain tribes, and they are often in rural areas, for the mountain tribes have these bows as their culture, and they even hunt with them, and these are people also, who are the defence of the nation, and they are allied with David, for there is a covenant, and they are as rocks and shapes of rocks of mountains, and some are even kings, mountains, and they know the right freedoms the people must have, and they maintain the integrity of the soil, that it is able to be planted in, to bring forth good, that the soil not go to mud and even slime, and David is a person who is soil and yet having the integrity of the rocks and mountains. Now as for you, who are compassionate, who are good soil, you are well to remember standard morality, and always be keeping with it within the right limits, and you are given the scripture, do not be over-righteous, be not overly wicked, and you are able to keep to morality with this, for you care about right and wrong. Now an atheist has not said in their heart, there is no right and wrong, and no morality, and yet a fool has said in their heart, there is no right and wrong, and all is opinion. Now a person mud, is illogical, and they speak making logical leaps, that are not logical, and they have no logic and integrity in their speech, for they are mud, and even worse is slime, that is Sodom.

Now do not accuse the delicate man, who seems effeminate, who is not a man desiring men, of being a man who desires men, for there is no rebuke for this thing, that he is delicate and seeming effeminate, and he does no wrong, and it is even good where it is because of good.

Now the like-woman, is not a thing of the physical, or the voice, or anything seen or heard, but like-woman that is in the New Testament, describes a type of wickedness of men, who lack integrity, who are petty in things not for men to judge and also it must be that their judgments are perverse wickedness, for I do not write about subtlety. Now wickedness must the case for it to be like-woman, that if they are not being the opposite of integrity and good, and they are accusing like women against women, for it is not the same for women to be like-woman, for they are women, and it is not wrong for them, and if these men are accusing men like women towards women, then this is the wickedness that is mentioned in the New Testament. Now I write here against Esua, and his being more man than man.

Now what is Mala again? But it is the spiritual realm, and it is true and real. Now what is Ria again? But it is the physical realm, and it is real, and the two are connected, and Mala influences Ria, and both are true. Now it is right for the priest, Christians, to be praying with things of Mala, and not things of Ria, that they do not go on in the calamitous tongue.

Now there is a lack of order I do not believe to be good in that I have no representative to go to if I would make a request from the priests, the Christians, for there is war between Heaven and hell, and much is required, for all those who are in danger and fight, and even for the angel, that there are requests to be made considering prayer. Now are not some of these even putting on white clothing, that they follow the Christ's teachings in this way, or am I mistaken that it is not necessary?

Now where should the Zion Temple be? But should it not be away from the capitals, that there be no blasphemy? Indeed, I believe it should. Now should it not be either, very accessible to all, or very accessible to all? Now should safety not be considered? Now who are its priests? But is it not Zion's Levites that are its priests? Now Christians, they are a majestic priest-hood, being very high, majesties and royal, only lower than the angels, a royal priest-hood, and because they are royal, I do not consider they are the priests for the Temple, but they have their own houses of worship. Now they are Zion, these Christians, and yet as if separate from Zion in a way, because they are a royal priest-hood, like Levites, and yet they are not Levites, for they are like doves, the innocent doves that are harmless, and they are given white to wear, pure doves and holy, turning the other cheek when they are slapped, loving their enemy, being charitable, and what is more innocent and blameless than these? Now because of the Zion Jews, there is the Zion Temple, and should it not also be easy for all nations to visit, and especially for those in the two countries that are bordered by the river? Now the high priest, he is given rule, perhaps in the religious fashion, from the river to the arctic, from sea to sea, and the crowns, each of them, are placed upon his head. Now let there be no base men as priest, I considered, for Jeraboam did such, and the people are able to find the true Zion Levites who are willing to be priests of the Zion Temple. Now as for the Christians, I am considering, it is not good for them to be below Zion, under Zion, but separated from Zion, even if citizens of Zion, that they, by the Christ, are going before God, and are not under Zion. Now then they go before God, because of the the Christ, that by His son they are able to do so.

Now what do I consider in my belief? But the mission is completed, the people of the Lord's kingdoms filling up the Earth, except for the polytheists, and you receive a revelation of wisdom, and understand the chaos and wickedness of some of these wars, when we are not against each other, for the devil's spirit with wrath is perceived in some of these conflicts between nations. Now Palestine has not been like other Muslim majority nations, and is it not very different? Now why is there conflict with China, if there is no real cause? But they ration, which they call communism, and yet there is no cause for conflict. Now I offer acknowledgement and peace to China, that they will consider peace with us, for they are become exceedingly great and we are able to benefit from each other if they are willing. Now you have received the Buddha, and Confucius, and will you not receive me in some fashion? Now is not Buddhism mentioned in the book of Zechariah, for it was carried away by two winged women, of Heaven, and they were going to prepare a place for it.

Now what other things will be built? But who is despising it, this that the Lord does? Now the devil despises it, and his spirit is iniquitous and bitter wickedness, and add to it hate and wrath, and where is his spirit found? But I have found this wicked bitterness with the polytheists, and their cults of the devil, for they are belonging to the devil, and yet they are not even Babylon. Now their adultery towards God has made the devil their lord, and likewise, too, it is happening to some women, that they are warned, and adultery has also slain men, for it is bitter and causes decay, that you consider, it is the same as drinking poison, though the drink is sweet when it is drunk, and yet the drink is poisoned and deadly, that it robs me of all reward the Lord would give, the rich abundance and the good things, and the arrogance of Beelzebub is found with the woman, when she encourages otherwise, and yet is divorce not possible? Now then be not desperate, that you are tempted to commit adultery, you who are male, for the adulterer, if you will reason far enough, is robbing your society that you are desperate to begin with. Now is not the married by Mala, that true love is the same as marriage, and the divorce is possible that true love may be cast away, and that which was not faithful perished, the spirit of them, and a slave remains who has a different name. Now she that loves right and truth, she is for what God is wanting on Earth, and how many who please God are there is known by God. Now iniquity takes the adulterer, and she can marry no more, and evil is gotten from the man, and life is robbed of him. Now for how long will your people prefer ignorance and promote foolishness? But do not desperate men exalt adultery, for they are most often those who are not desired otherwise, unless it is adultery, from a woman who is more desperate because of unhappiness in her marriage, that she is willing. Now she has already then committed adultery, who commits the act, and her who has never been married, who was deceived by that which did not love her, that hated her, the Lord has put away his sin, some of them, who have committed this adultery. Now let your eyes first be in truth, that you remove the blinding darkness from your vision, that you be first able to see truth, and then also, if there is a speck, remove the speck as well, that you then be able to see clearly and see the truth, for there are many already bound by the devil, that you are able to be among the people of light. Now they are a hindering anchor to the people of light, holding back society, and they meddle sometimes and rebel, when they are all ignored, or will they not? Now I can give no type of law for it, but it must be understood with wisdom, with Mala, and it is case by case, and yet have there not been women who have been deceived by a man who did not care for them, or regard them, who did not love them at all, who beat them, and not with passion of any love, but with cruelty, and she was pure, her whole spirit pure in divorcing him, and she could not commit adultery in marrying another, and yet she was condemned? Now she did not use the lake of fire to keep her spirit clean of iniquity, to convert to Babylon, to keep her spirit clean of rebellion and iniquity towards the Lord, but the lake of fire did not enter into her spirit, and she held herself pure and the lake of fire was not there, and she was pure, and God was her father, and the Christ, did He not keep her, and eyes that she might perceive the devil who hated her, now another is a sycophant and is for desecrating, and the devil wished to abuse her who was kept pure, and that which was innocent, not able to be pardoned, and that woman deceived, kept pure. Now a man must judge by the Lord, and only the man knows what it is, concerning himself and others, what the Lord judges in terms of romantic things and romantic relationships, for he cannot disobey the Lord in these things, and the Lord is his creator, and he would be punished, and also it is wrong for the kingdoms of the Lord that the man disobeys, and again, only the man knows what the Lord's judgment is. Now will the Lord's son, with the Lord, give much mercy to the devil, not Beelzebub, but a different name, when there is iniquity in her and her soul hates him, and she is not the Lord's anymore? Now cast away all the devil's people, the small multitude of them, when they meddle and partner with the devil in these things, for they meddle and argue for the devil, and the small multitude makes themselves as if the majority, and yet they are not even one quarter of the people, not even one fifth. Now if they will meddle, they must all be cast away, for they are already the devil's people, and they do combat, for they would like to slay with guile, with adultery even, a man who pleases God. Now the woman of light has her twin, who is not really a twin, who is the devil's, and so find the woman of light if the woman of the devil's is attempting to bring you to her.

Now there was the shepherd of the devil sowing discord constantly between the men and women, and the man had part of the prostitute of the enemy, and he was sowing discord, and women were not having their portion, and were ashamed of it sometimes, wrongly, for none judged them, and none said poorly of them, and it was a false belief that fell lightly upon them, for it came from nothing, what was not there, and yet the devil's shepherd who sowed discord, he was a man, and kindness with him, and as if indifferent and without concern or regard, kind at times and even compassionate, and yet he was brought forth from envy and hate and wicked bitterness, despising the Lord and man, and he relief burden of blessing and good for the woman without her asking for it, or saying any opinion, that he relieve the burden of good for her before she become burdened by it. Now by envy, he removed the burden of praise for integrity and the glory for her beauty in her integrity, for she should not be burdened by it, or in his cruelty and rebellion, enslaved by it, that in his envy he reasoned, she should not be burden with the glory that she would have, the glory of her beauty because of wisdom and integrity she had, and then I considered more, and he removed her glory and blessing in many places, that she not be troubled or burdened with it, for he did as a man, to protect her from his place of Shepherding, this Shepherd who despised God and hated men, for he did so with his words, with his power when he had it, with all he had, as if lightly, for what effort did it take him, and it was all because of envy and wrath in him, and hatred of men, for her glory was also a blessing to her husband, and he hated the man, and he sowed discord between the man and women, and there was too much for me to consider it all, and the woman was bullied, but it did not fall on her, and she was not bullied, and I looked, and there was a line that should not be there, for the foundation of Zion was established, and the line was made, a thin and frail blanket, and it would not allow Zion to build up further, and it was like Egypt, but not Egypt, and it was a blanket of hell, and ignorance and darkness, and even foolishness and calamity, and it was placed upon Zion in places and Zion was not built higher, and it was blamed, perhaps, on democracy, and yet democracy had not done it. Now the blanket is light and frail, and hinders none, and it is thrown away or passed through, or not even regarded, and yet if brutality to comes to any who has what is above it, then is it not understood that the devil is attacking and has perceived a threat, that he has instigated rage into the hearts of his servants, to stir up rage in them, rather than let them have indifference and to have their eyes upon their own lives, that they should be greatly motivated to do his will and attack for him? Now what defence was there from the righteous men to defend a man who was righteous? But the devil had warned them from defending their neighbour by struck them as if in combat with discord and false-beliefs, wanting to strike them with jealousy that they never defend their neighbour, and he struck without right, without permission, for these were men of integrity, having been righteous, that he did so like combat, like one who goes into a nation and comes upon a person to cast stones at them, and throw knives and fire arrows at them, and what defence did they have from the devil? Now they resisted and yet he hurled more arrows at them, and were their human hearts capable of being firm against what he did? Now it is the same as an attack by the devil towards an angel, and yet the angel is part of the war between Heaven and hell, and so what else would the angel expect? But these were humans, righteous men, and did they not resist enough? Now were there not then people who are the devil's servants knowing, and having the wisdom, the great and long books, of ways to sow discord, that integrity not be shown in the defence and trust of others that is righteous? Now I considered, it was like soldiers who come upon soldiers, without their knowing, to sow discord for them, and I knew there were indeed churches, claiming to be Christian, that were worshipping the devil, and they did not tell the other churches, and I knew there were enemy nations, and yet how would people consider that any of them would be a threat to them, for they did not know what their mission was, and who their greatest target was, only they feared that these men might defend righteous people, being righteous, and it was enough of a threat. Now if they are able to do this easily, in a broad way, then the angel would do good, and undo their work in a broad way, if he is able. Now if the devil attempts to claim a city, will some not attempt to claim it back for good? Now what was shown during the former war between one half of the Earth and the other? But they showed all much adultery, and desecration of what was sacred, showing that which was most desecration of the sacred, to portray greater evil than adultery, and they showed much lack of integrity, as if people were animals, who lacked integrity, and it was as if sicophantry, and it was, and it sowed distrust, and brought the hearts into rebellion, and taught the wisdom of a lesser society, of Egypt, and it is not a thing of any shade, the some were deceived by it, and considered it like the teaching of their elders, the teachings of their people's religion, not going with the teachings of God, and they placed trust in this society, that was only there in imagination, that they did foolishly, and suffered the consequences of it, for they became like slaves in Egypt and worse. Now remove the lesser society of Egypt, and those who are of any shade can be Egyptians, being of the morality of Egypt, when they have righteousness and integrity, these are not bastards and have never been, and do not despise them, for it has already been the case with your people, that your people have been such in the past. Now it is better to be an Egyptian than to hate judgment and justice when it is right, that you blaspheme with ideals of being one of the people, to commit injustice and hate judgment and justice, for it is not being one of the people to favour the people instead of judgment and justice and the compassion that is owed to those it is owed to. Now an Egyptian, spiritually, is your people, and Zion Jews are your people, and so are others, but those who favour the people over judgment and compassion, these are despicable, and they do very great wickedness and injustice, for those who love this foolishness, they are without guilt by foolishness, that it is not the people who love this foolishness.

Now it is wrong to convert anything by force, to alter it to something else, for this is the Lord's domain, and only He has the right.

Now Palestine has been moved back from its land and yet it was the land of the Hebrew Jews first and they took it and did they not give it again to the Jews? Now is it not because of the Temple? But the angel will not betray the Muslims to visit the Temple unless Muslims have seized it. Now else I would be a transgressor and treacherous and yet if the Muslims have seized it I may visit it. Now if it is given to the Jews how will I visit without Muslims with me? Now the Zion Temple I may visit but the Temple in Israel I may not visit as easily, for there must be Muslims with me and it is even better if Muslims have seized the Temple if I visit for the angel must seize the Temple if he should visit. Now as for Palestine, is it not good to be shutting your ears and looking away from Israel, for they are not what you look towards and they do not give anything to you, and yet you are cut off. Now should you ever focus on the Jews rather than focus on Islam? But the angel has found adultery in you and it is like a spirit of polytheism that rebellion like witch-craft is with you and you become closer to the polytheists who have the devil as their lord. Now the adultery is the polytheism and you should not be focusing upon Israel rather than focusing upon Islam and your own wellness. Now I have the right to give advice to you and I do not add to any scripture, for it is the sin of polytheism that makes you different than other nations where there are mostly Muslims. Now the polytheism of Palestine is not the same as polytheism when it is willingly committed, and I do not believe Palestine should be abandoned. Now the Jews cannot block you from the sacred cities and if Abraham is your father but not Jacob do the Jews not sin in some ways? But you have Zion and all the people of it and you have the sacred cities and Zion is with you, for Zion must give you favour because polytheism, a spirit of it, is within your borders. Now nations will not let Jerusalem fall for the mockery of the nations not Muslim has made you to have polytheism within your borders and the Jews cannot understand anything about you for you are Muslims, with angels, and Abraham is your father. Now Abraham has the right to give you the Temple in Jerusalem and yet if an angel does not visit it is right for you to give it over to the Jews. Now the Jews have not known and who of any has known, for the revelation of wisdom is now given  that the Muslims are because of the obedience of the angels. Now it is right that some Jews are in the Temple if the angel enters it or is in the courtyard of it and yet it must be seized by Muslims. Now Abraham was good to angels and he was able to dwell among them as a very mighty man is able. Now recognize Palestine if you believe in angels and let there be kindness and peace between you and the Muslim nations for as you are peaceful in this thing of the Temple it is a covenant of peace between you and the Muslims. Now if another nation sows discord let them be considerate to not sow discord in what they do, for wisdom is better than strength and much blood has been spilled. Now let not any person who speaks publicly sow discord for the angel does not acknowledge the right of any of them to sow discord, and is not the Lord with me? Now He is also with Zion and Jerusalem. Now the angel seizes it all in these cases and does not acknowledge the right of the elected, who are not religion, to sow discord. Now Hebrew Jews, find your leaders who are anointed by the prophet, for elected leaders rob you of your kings, and they are from other nations, these leaders, and they rob you even more, for I will not utter it, will not write it, and so I spread a protection over Zion and Jerusalem, to defend it from leaders who would sow discord, who are elected, and the very mighty men of Eretz Chadrack, I can spread nothing rightly as defence against them, for it would be unjust, and these only, I ask that all give special consideration to where it concerns the angel and Zion. Now these are the very mighty soldiers in Eretz Chadrack, and it is not undone for them to have this special consideration. Now let David and his heirs be leaders among you, Israel, for foreign leaders who are elected have robbed you without intending to do you harm, for you are too dependant on them, that your kings do not take gifts with considerations of peace, but you take gifts as if from an Uncle who fosters you at times, and so you do not have your kings, and you do not have David, who might be acceptable to Palestine, for if you had the kings, and they emerged, would you not then be acceptable, that they would send peace to your kings. Now if David was your king, I would go away secretly, and stand at a place that he would see me, and yet he is not your king and the kings you do not have. Now I would not go on behalf of any, or tell any person where I had gone. Now only to David would I go. Now to a very mighty man of Israel I would go to council him to war against Midianites, if they plagued the land, but it is not the time of the Earth for it, and only to these two would I go. Now it is not that time, and if it was still that time for the Earth, then the Christ would not yet have come and there would not yet be Muslims. Now if David emerges then I will not visit the Temple, for if he returns, I will not visit, for it would not be right for me to go to Israel to visit the Temple. Now the Zion Temple must be in Eretz Chadrack or some other place, and it cannot be in America, because of the wars of America, and yet it is the Temple Zion, for it is the sign of Zion, and all people are welcome to visit it, only it is respectful that none bow or pray to anything they find in the Temple or in the courtyard. Now as for Israel, acknowledge all of Zion that I have written about in these books, and you are still the Lord's, and the Lord is God of Zion and Jerusalem, and I advise that Palestine is having good access to another Muslim majority nation and having good relations with them, for they are almost cut off. Now if Palestine becomes greater, there is no threat to you, for there is Zion and it is the Lord's, and Jerusalem is the Lord's. Now I considered, should not one of Judua be king, or one of David? But you are able to be independent and the Jews are called to belief. Now many of you are backwards Jews, and it is revealed by the books of Nathan the prophet, when they are read backwards, and is it not acceptable? But I considered it is not good that most of you should be backwards. Now Israel cannot care for Palestine, because Muslims are because of the obedience of the angels. Now every trigger for conflict is an act of war because of the situation, that you not lie like petty children who believe life and death is only a child's game, and you not mock and bully, for there has been life and death, for Palestine is Muslim, and a different type of people, in the angel category, of things in that domain, and Hebrew Jews in the human category of people, that they cannot be friends, and cannot benefit each other, for one is looking towards the sacred cities in Saudi Arabia, and it is right for them, and another towards The Temple in Jerusalem, and it is not built. Now in peace, you do not win, you willingly lose, for it is so sometimes in a fashion of speaking, and what Moses gave is not a religion of being mighty, even if some are mighty, and Israel is bordered by a people who are because of the obedience of angels, and for what reason, then, will they have any fear? But the Earth is the Lord's, and all are on the same side, except for the polytheists. Now they are the only enemy that remains for any people on Earth, for it is revealed, with the revelation of wisdom, that all are on the same side, all being acceptable and pleasing to God in what they believe and follow, and the polytheists, only, are those who are having the devil as their lord. Now when did God ever command his people to attack those who believed in him and obeyed him in the right way they should?

Now wisdom is better than strength, and it excels the work of strength and then give it might, and wisdom is even more excelling, for there is that which is then a second resort for you, that the white supremacists, the neo-nazis, can come unto you, in Israel and to Palestine, and they will be there that I may not ever visit the Temple.

Now what was Solomon like? But was he not like the Christ in most ways, and yet different in some ways, for he sweared, caring for righteousness, and it is acceptable for Jews, and the son of God cannot swear, and so where is he? But then he is not in the palace of Solomon, but then he must be David, but David too can swear, and He is the lord of David, greater than him and his head is not anointed, and he is the son of God. Now having fulfilled all righteousness required of a man, and all righteousness of Elijah, as well, He was perfect, and Elijah raised from the dead, and the Christ, being perfect and without sin, was not able to be in hell, and He came to life, and angels, in obedience to the Lord, rolled away the covering from the tomb where they had placed His body. Now when did He ever say, I call the righteous to repentance and come to save them? But do you now believe He was not a Jew, fulfilling righteousness, offering to you first who are having the first chance, for the angel has said in his heart, I offer the priest-hood of the descendants of Japeth the chance first, and it must be offered to them first, to be doing well concerning some of what has been written in these books, and because I must obey God, because of justice, I must give the chance to others to claim blessing if the priest-hood rejects the opportunity, and I do not write of illegal things. Now this is required from me because of justice. Now from one who is not human, now you can read it, that I am not one of the sons of Noah, although I am fair shade, for now you can read that the Christ was indeed yours, loyal to Israel, loyal to God, the same God you worship, He was God, and God was His father, and are you called to follow different ways by Him? Now where is the Christ? But He is above David, in Heaven, and Saul was sick, and some rebel, those who follow more Moses, and transgress, for I use the Christ as the weight and measure, the standard to judge the people, and what is Moses then? But the Christ can not be over him. Now Moses is beside him. Now what is Elijah? Now the Christ cannot be over him either. Now Elijah is also beside him. Now for those of you who are well with God, and are beside the Christ, it is acceptable, and those looking towards David and his lord, who is the Christ, this is acceptable. Now some come to His throne, at the bottom of the steps to his throne, and others are beside him. Now some consider Him with God, and others only God, and yet they believe He is His son. Now He is the Devar Hasham who spoke to Zecheria. Now to you who are Hebrew Jews, He is the scripture, the word of the Lord. Now Moses and Elijah fulfilled the word, and not all, for they did not fullfill as much as the Christ, when he came as a human man, and David obeyed the word and the word was his lord, that he obeyed all the Lord asked him to do. Now I write no more, only that you are given more than is required.

Now for you Hebrew Jews who are following your way, if you do not obey the commands you have been given, what are you? But are you a Jew if the Jews are called to believe? But a Jew not found in obedience, and let it not be a hard thing to hear for you, for I give no effort to rebuking worthless things or trying to give them advice, for they are not worth the time. Now if you are not able to obey the word given to you, then I offer my advice, of accepting the Christ and being a Zion Jew, only you will not be Hebrew Jew anymore, but a gentile, Zion Jew, as if being born to what you have called gentiles, who are not if they are Zion Jews. Now to mix your having been a Hebrew Jew with becoming a gentile to then become a Zion Jew, is wickedness and cannot be, for you cannot be both, and this is another thing not told to you, or written that you could know it, that if you are not able to obey the word, and the ways given to you by the scripture, then you are offered to become gentiles, and then Zion Jews, only the priest-hood of Japeth is right to drive you out if you are a Zion Jew boasting of being a Hebrew Jew, for you cannot be both, and it is injustice that causes offence for others, and is offence to the kingdoms of God and wickedness towards others. Now after you are Zion Jews, you are indeed in truth Zion Jews, and of the same people as the Zion Jews who were never Hebrew. Now it is offered to you if you are not able to obey the word.

Now those Hebrew slaves, who are slaves of the Hebrew Jews, mean and brutal, iniquitous, and cruel, these are not Jews, or Hebrew in any way, but they are beneath the Earth, and are animals, and they are having the devil as their lord. Now they belong more among the polytheists, and a prostitute of the enemy, she is also a thing of slaves, having many brutalities of slaves in her. Now the Lord strikes down, and servant, who was not worthy, goes to slave, and iniquity is repeated with iniquity, and the Lord is God. Now there is no male or female with slaves, and they hear no rebuke, and only hear the chain and whip, for they are as if deaf. Now the person who places a helmet upon one who is not a slave, in their evil, the Lord is God, that you fear Him, and know He judges and takes revenge, and so if any is not fearing Him so much that they do not even regard it, already they are a brutal thing, like a beast, and beneath those they do evil to.

Now by the Christ you may eat anything, and yet it is good, for it seemed to have been without saying, that you only eat things that are edible, even if you are not forbidden. Now the one who eats swine, and you are Jews, does not obey the word. Now you are indeed having to obey the scripture, the word, if you are to be Jews, in that you would be Hebrew Jews, or else you are offered to be gentiles, and then Zion Jews. Now a false religion is that which believes in being Jews and not obeying God, being Jews only by birth, for it is an empty religion of narcissism and cruel wind. But why not rather commit adultery and die this way, or poison yourselves that you might be at least better, if your body does not perish? Now you Hebrew Jews who are angry with me, honour me and I will listen to what you say, or your head is removed in Mala from your body, if you are able to believe in these things, for if you are angry with me in this thing, rebuke me in anger and the Lord is just, for it is a slave lost its head in a word of mala I offer. Now if you are devil to me in this thing, the number of the beast forms in you and there is no more chance for you anymore. Now you who believe, who are Hebrew Jews, save those you care about, and keep them back from an angel if their tongue would bring them into judgment of being dangerously struck by God, for in this you are beloved, if you save them in this thing, for they are questioning a thing that should have been without any question.

Now if you are obeying the word, and it is your people that they are obeying the word, people who believe, then after a time, when you have developed sufficiently in truth and justice and the order of the things of God, for this thing I do not expect you to know of, but those who understand it are understanding it, then there will be a time when there is no need for the angel to be accompanied by Muslims if he visits The Temple, and Muslims will not need to seize it in order for the angel to visit the Temple, and yet before that will there not be a new people emerging, not as childish, and you will have your elected leaders, if you keep them, and yet you will have something like theocracy, or theocracy, and what would I say to you, that your own leaders of Israel would not say to you, for would you even require me? Now I would advise, let none go in the way of Cain, to condemn and judge in a murderous fashion, but judgments are with truth. Now when these things happen, will you not have a king, in addition to your elected leader, and he is king in terms of religion? Now do not Muslims resent your elected, secular leaders? Now it is from the Christ, remove the darkness from your eyes, and do you not also remove the speck? But then you see what is true, to see as if in the light.

Now if you will judge by mala, spiritually, to say this is not wrong in this case, or this is something else entirely, though it appears the same, that you would judge this way, you must see with truth, without darkness in your eyes and the speck, that you may be able to judge as a very wise person, able to advise pardon and advise withholding pardon. Now you are given the scripture that you be not overly righteous and not overly wicked, that none is a stumbling block and a harasser to any person, for I write concerning Zion and Jerusalem. Now as for judgments, yet you know the essential things, and they seem too much for you? But to take the great blessing, it should not seem too much, and why is your heart not for greater blessing and good from God? Now are you not wanting more good from God?

Now you know when a slave desecrates anything sacred and right, and they are expected to do so, for they do so with brutality and iniquity and much meanness.

Now high priest, the devil, of the house of purity and good, your anger has no right with me, and who says the people will not have the wisdom? Now I have found you even in false-Solomons, those they had misunderstanding about, and other false-Jews, those who were the devil's Jews, and some were Hebrew and others from Zion. Now I have perceived the devil even there, angry for no reason and very angry.

Now the devil has many personalities, as if different people, and Belzebub is a brutal and mean old man, wise in wickedness, arragant in his encouragements, and the high priest of purity and good, a middle-aged man, angry and angry at others without reason, and the beast man of homicide, and the transgressing viper of rebellion, found with some who are the devil's. Now there were quick flying Cains, and many were also Cain-Harrods, and moths of the lake of fire, fragile as the butterflies, and the butterflies not actually fragile, and the smallest cat that dwells in the house is catching and killing moths, and is he not a man, this small cat? But the tiger does not do it, and does the tiger care for the well-being of angels? But the small cat protects the soldiers when they are not in battle, when they are at home, for does not the small cat find the very wicked, for they are an abomination beyond wicked, and he cuts their hands off and hangs them over a pool, upside down, and he is not a man, and yet more a man than any. Now larger cats, do not accuse him unless it is for specific wrongs and not the general of what is acceptable to the Lord, and why would any large cat accuse him? Now David, the leopard, or cougar, or mountain lion, not as strong as Judua, but strong, he is killing what he kills. Now every wicked thing of the Bible is a servant of the devil, and do not the devil-cults already know it, and gather these people? Now there are strong Cains, as if having kindness that is revealed to be false and mean, and Harrods are circumcised of their jealousy, by not giving due respect, for when they should give even more room, they are circumcised of their jealousy with brutality of a slave, for the wicked circumcision brings them low. Now it is most often towards the beautiful man that they Harrods are being circumcised to lack respect. Now if wicked things are found Jerusalem and they are found in Zion, yet there is a war between Heaven and hell, and the devil's people will never cease doing their wicked work.










